#! /bin/sh
# This is a shell archive.  Remove anything before this line, then unpack
# it by saving it into a file and typing "sh file".  To overwrite existing
# files, type "sh file -c".  You can also feed this as standard input via
# unshar, or by typing "sh <file", e.g..  If this archive is complete, you
# will see the following message at the end:
#		"End of archive 1 (of 13)."
# Contents:  README MANIFEST Newstuff Spoilers.mm date.h food.tbl
# Wrapped by billr@tekred on Mon Jun 20 11:38:06 1988
PATH=/bin:/usr/bin:/usr/ucb ; export PATH
if test -f README -a "${1}" != "-c" ; then 
  echo shar: Will not over-write existing file \"README\"
else
echo shar: Extracting \"README\" \(7320 characters\)
sed "s/^X//" >README <<'END_OF_README'
X			      NetHack V2.2 README
X
X	This file contains information on the 2.2 release of NetHack.  For
Xinformation on previous releases, see the README.OLD file.  For a detailed
Xhistory of the game, see the README.ORIG file, which contains three separate
Xreadme files, dating back to the original release of the game (then named
Xhack) by Jay Fenlason.
X
X	This release of the game contains a large number of bug fixes, as
Xwell as several new features.  There has been a large amount of play-testing
Xdone on this release, as it is to be a complete release (approximately 1Mb)
Xof source and uuencoded auxilary files.  For a detailed list of bug fixes,
Xand additions look at the file "Fixes.2.2".  I cannot guarantee that every
Xmodification done has been included, but I have done my best to chronicle the
Xchanges and fixes made there.  Here are the high points:
X
X  1)	New flags in "config.h" (some of these were included in 1.4f):
X
X	COM_COMPL	Command line completion by John S. Bien
X	GRAPHICS	Funky screen character support (Eric S. Raymond)
X	HACKOPTIONS	Support DGK-style HACKOPTIONS processing (ESR)
X	RPH		Various hacks by Richard P. Hughey
X	KJSMODS		Various changes made by Kevin Sweet
X	BVH		Additions by Bruce Holloway
X
X	In addition, in an MSDOS enviornment, when GRAPHICS is defined:
X
X	MSDOSCOLOR	Colour highlighting of monsters, etc.
X
X	Of the above, I haven't tested HACKOPTIONS and MSDOSCOLOR.  If you
X	find bugs in these, send me the reports.
X
X  2)	New objects:
X
X	blindfold - allows you to avoid the gaze of a Floating Eye and to
X		    use your telepathy on command if you have it.
X
X	mirror - scares monsters if you use it on them (and other uses).
X
X	ring of polymorph - (usually cursed) forces random polymorphs.
X
X	ring of polymorph control - prevents system shock and allows choice of
X				    creature to polymorph into.
X
X  3)	New Files:
X
X	- A new set of documentation, the "Guidebook to the Mazes of Menace"
X	has been supplied by Eric S. Raymond.  The guidebook is written for
X	nroff using the "mn" macro set supplied with Bnews 2.11 or greater.
X	Since not everyone has these macros, I have run the guidebook through
X	nroff, and supplied it in flat ascii format as well.  [Moderator's
X	note: because of past problems, I ran the formatted version
X	through "col -b" before passing it on to remove ^H's, etc.  -br]
X
X	- A copy of "HACK.CNF" which has been renamed "NetHack.cnf" was
X	supplied by Steve Creps. The file decl.c has been updated to reflect
X	this change.
X
X	- A new "Makefile" for the AT&T Unix machines has been added.
X
X	- I was hoping to get documentation on "NANSI.SYS" as well, but got
X	no responses to the mail I sent the author, direct and via Bill
X	Randle at tekred.  As per usual, I will gladly publish any relevant
X	documentation I get.
X
X  4)	Major game changes:
X
X	- Shop generation has been significantly changed.  A new structure
X	has been introduced which allows shops (except the "general" type)
X	to have up to three different types of object inside.  There is also
X	a new "distribution pattern" parameter which tells the generation
X	code how to lay out the shop (this is preliminary to the addition of
X	two new types of shop, the temple and barracks - more on this later).
X
X	- Shopkeepers will now tell you how much they expect for each object
X	you pick up.  This gives you the ability to haggle with the merchant
X	in question by dropping and picking up objects until you are more or
X	less satisfied with the price.  I have re-written "getprice()" in
X	shk.c in an attempt to make sure that you cannot actually sell any
X	particular object for more than the shopkeeper will charge for it.
X
X	- Another change to shopkeepers has them potentially getting angry if
X	you stay beside them after not paying your bill.  Each they time they
X	ask you to pay up, there is a chance they will decide they don't like
X	people who don't pay...
X
X	- A new monster, the hydra, has been added (as you have probably seen
X	on the net).  I haven't had much chance to test out this feature of
X	the game.  Mirrors have also been added, and seem to work quite well.
X
X	- Changes have been made to the object ocurrence chances in objects.h,
X	so that the relatively rare tools, etc. have at least a 1% chance of
X	showing up.
X
X	- Throwing and zapping code has been modified so that there is a
X	chance that said can be done through a doorway.  Bolts can still
X	bounce however...
X
X	- The infamous and dreaded makemon() bug has been eliminated.  In
X	addition to this, "r"ats and "K"obolds have been added back into the
X	game.  "K"ops no longer leave treasure (just what they were carrying,
X	plus maybe a club or whistle).
X
X	- Two new "super"swords have been added.  They are the katana named
X	"Snickersnee" which is +5 on damage (due to sharpness), and the long
X	sword "Excalibur" which is +rnd(10) to hit, +5 on damage, and has a
X	couple of other features I won't go into right now.  The only way
X	for a character to get "Excalibur" is as a gift from someone.  You
X	cannot write the word "Excalibur" on things for some reason...
X
X	- There have been two additions to disallow infinite wand charges.
X	First of all, wands with less than zero charges will automatically
X	turn to dust (thanks to Kevin Sweet).  Next, a wand of cancellation
X	will set the number of charges in the wand to -1, which will make it
X	forever useless, (thanks to Ron Wessels).
X
X  5)	Minor game changes:
X
X	- The fountain code has been tightened slightly so you can no longer
X	dip objects into a fountain or drink from one while you are floating
X	in mid-air due to levitation.
X
X	- Teleporting to hell via a teleportation trap will no longer occur
X	if the character does not have fire resistance.  I found this just
X	too arbitrary a way to die (and so did several other people who com-
X	plained about it).
X
X	- A new trap, the "polymorph" trap has been added by Richard Hughey.
X	It's inclusion is dependant on having "KAA" defined.
X
X	- In wizard mode, the wizard player has infinite wishes, and the
X	ability to instantly identify everything (s)he is carrying. The wizard
X	player is also no longer limited by the standard multiple / bonus res-
X	trictions on objects wished for.
X
X	- Random number generation has been changed around to make it (I hope)
X	more unpredictable.
X
X	- A large number of typos have been fixed, and all of the British
X	spellings converted to American.  I would like to see a shell script
X	to allow conversion back (or something like that) in the future.
X
X	- I have done a "make depend" for the makefiles to reflect a slight
X	restructuring in the order of inclusion of header files.
X
X  6)	Future additions:
X
X	- Steve Creps is working on "barracks" and "soldier" code which is
X	now ready for addition.  I have added the "soldier" side into the
X	game, but haven't really tested it.  Steve will be adding the
X	"barracks" section in and sending me the resulting patches.  There
X	will be a minor (read patch) release as soon as he can get the code
X	integrated into this release and sent up here to me.
X
X	- There are also several other new room projects in the works which
X	should be able to be included in that minor release, along with any
X	bug reports that are made in the interim.
X
X						Mike Stephenson
X
XMail:	Genamation Inc.		Phone:	(416) 475-9434
X	351 Steelcase Rd. W
X	Markham, Ontario.	UUCP:	uunet!{mnetor, utzoo}!genat!mike
X	Canada   L3R 3W1
END_OF_README
if test 7320 -ne `wc -c <README`; then
    echo shar: \"README\" unpacked with wrong size!
fi
# end of overwriting check
fi
if test -f MANIFEST -a "${1}" != "-c" ; then 
  echo shar: Will not over-write existing file \"MANIFEST\"
else
echo shar: Extracting \"MANIFEST\" \(3864 characters\)
sed "s/^X//" >MANIFEST <<'END_OF_MANIFEST'
X   File Name		Archive #	Description
X-----------------------------------------------------------
X Fixes.2.2                13	
X Guidebook                 1	
X Guidebook.mn              3	
X MANIFEST                  1	This shipping list
X Make.ini                 20	
X Makefile.att              9	
X Makefile.pc              18	
X Makefile.tcc             18	
X Makefile.unix            17	
X Makefile.xenix           17	
X Maketcc.ini              20	
X NetHack.cnf               6	
X README                    1	
X README.OLD               16	
X README.ORIG              14	
X alloc.c                  19	
X apply.c                   8	
X bones.c                  19	
X cmd.c                    13	
X config.h                 16	
X data.base                14	
X date.h                   13	
X decl.c                    1	
X do.c                     15	
X do_name.c                15	
X do_wear.c                14	
X dog.c                    18	
X dogmove.c                16	
X dothrow.c                17	
X eat.c                     9	
X edog.h                    8	
X end.c                    15	
X engrave.c                11	
X eshk.h                   20	
X extern.h                 20	
X fight.c                   8	
X flag.h                   19	
X fountain.c               16	
X func_tab.h               20	
X gen.h                    11	
X gold.h                    3	
X hack.c                    6	
X hack.h                   20	
X help                     18	
X hh                       20	
X invent.c                  4	
X ioctl.c                  20	
X lev.c                    10	
X make.exe.uu               2	
X makedefs.c                2	
X makemon.c                15	
X mfndpos.h                20	
X mhitu.c                  10	
X mklev.c                   7	
X mkmaze.c                 18	
X mkobj.c                  18	
X mkroom.h                 20	
X mkshop.c                 17	
X mon.c                     7	
X monmove.c                11	
X monst.c                  19	
X monst.h                  18	
X msdos.c                   9	
X msdos.h                  20	
X nansi.sys.uu             19	
X nethack.6                18	
X nethack.cnf              20	
X nethack.sh               20	
X netquest.sh              20	
X o_init.c                 17	
X obj.h                    20	
X objclass.h               14	
X objects.h                 9	
X objnam.c                 11	
X onames.h                 15	
X options.c                10	
X pager.c                  14	
X pcmain.c                 12	
X pctty.c                  18	
X pcunix.c                 19	
X permonst.h                5	
X polyself.c               17	
X potion.c                 10	
X pray.c                   17	
X pri.c                    12	
X prisym.c                 16	
X read.c                    8	
X rip.c                    20	
X rm.h                     19	
X rnd.c                    20	
X rumors.base               6	
X rumors.c                 19	
X rumors.kaa               19	
X rumors.mrx               20	
X save.c                   13	
X search.c                 19	
X shk.c                     4	
X shknam.c                 14	
X sit.c                    19	
X spell.c                  13	
X spell.h                  20	
X steal.c                  18	
X termcap.c                16	
X termcap.cnf              20	
X termcap.uu                5	
X timeout.c                19	
X topl.c                   19	
X topten.c                  7	
X track.c                  20	
X trap.c                    3	
X trap.h                    4	
X u_init.c                 11	
X unixmain.c               12	
X unixtty.c                15	
X unixunix.c               13	
X vault.c                  17	
X version.c                12	
X wield.c                  19	
X wizard.c                 12	
X worm.c                   18	
X worn.c                   20	
X write.c                  16	
X wseg.h                   20	
X you.h                    19	
X zap.c                     5	
END_OF_MANIFEST
if test 3864 -ne `wc -c <MANIFEST`; then
    echo shar: \"MANIFEST\" unpacked with wrong size!
fi
# end of overwriting check
fi
if test ! -d Newstuff ; then
    echo shar: Creating directory \"Newstuff\"
    mkdir Newstuff
fi
if test -f Spoilers.mm -a "${1}" != "-c" ; then 
  echo shar: Will not over-write existing file \"Spoilers.mm\"
else
echo shar: Extracting \"Spoilers.mm\" \(89033 characters\)
sed "s/^X//" >Spoilers.mm <<'END_OF_Spoilers.mm'
X
X.ND "December 10, 1987"
X.TL
X(Net)Hack ``Spoilers'' Reference Manual
X.AF "{amd, ihnp4, microsoft, ucscc}!sco!stevem"
X.AU "Edited by Stephen Marino*"
X.AS x .5i
X.\" This is a kludge to get the date on the cover sheet.
X(Net)Hack is a Rogue-like dungeon game that runs on a variety
Xof computer systems in as many implementations.  Although much
Xof the information in this document is generic to Hack, it is
Xslanted toward the newest release, NetHack.  This reference is
Xneither a man page nor a basic instruction manual. Beginners
Xand those who wish to learn strictly from experience should
Xrefer to the \fIGuide to the Mazes of Menace\fR, a revised
Xedition of Ken Arnold's \fIGuide to the Dungeons of Doom\fR
Xby Eric S. Raymond.  The (Net)Hack ``Spoilers'' Reference Manual
Xis an exhaustive compilation of facts,
Xstrategies, and what are known in the vernacular as SPOILERS.
XThe reader is warned that this guide leaves little to the
Ximagination.  Although probably a bit overwhelming for the
Xcomplete novice, this manual should prove useful
Xto those who want to know almost everything about the game. 
X.SP 2
X\*(DT
X.\" These are footnotes on the cover sheet.
X.FS *
XMany people are responsible for the text of this document, but it
Xis principally the work of Dave Harmon, Greg Samson, Melissa Silvestre,
XRobert Thau, Tony Lazar, ``Daniel G. Winkowski'', Carlton Hommel and
X``Colonel'' George L. Sicherman, who all created a set of hint files
Xfor Hack 1.0.1.  Also, my thanks to Douglas Rosengard, whose tutorial
Xtaught me a couple of things even I didn't know.
XMy apologies to anyone I've missed.
X.FE
X.AE
X.MT 4
X.CS
X.nr % 0
X.bp
X.ds +3 +2 +0 +0
X.PH ''SPOILERS''
X.PF 'DRAFT'%'12/10/87'
X.ce 3
X\s+2\fB(Net)Hack ``Spoilers'' Reference Manual\fR
X.sp
X\fIEdited by Stephen Marino\fR\s-2
X.sp
X\fB{amd, ihnp4, microsoft, ucscc}!sco!stevem\fR
X.sp
X.H 1 "INTRODUCTION"
XIf you are relatively new to Hack, keep the handy reference sheet
Xin Appendix A close by.  Beware of features that may not apply to
Xyour version; NetHack features are flagged where possible.
X.P
XYour character begins on level one of a 30+ level dungeon.
XAccompanying you is your faithful dog, which should be named (with the
X``C'' command).  The idea is to kill monsters, gather gold,
Xand (eventually) retrieve the Amulet of Yendor.  The primary objective, however,
Xis to survive, which isn't that easy.  To help (or hinder) your progress are
Xmagic items, traps and other contrivances developed by scores of programmers,
Xall calculated to drive the player mad with frustration.
X'
X.H 2 "How to Use this Guide"
X'
XThis paper is organized into the following sections:
X.BL
X.LI
XBasic Instructions
X.LI
XStrategy
X.LI
XRooms and Other Bad Places
X.LI
XTo Eat, or Not to Eat
X.LI
XMonsters
X.LI
XWeapons and Armor
X.LI
XScrolls, Potions, Rings and Wands
X.LI
XExtended Command Set
X.LI
XSpecial Items
X.LI
XTricks and Other Non-intuitive Actions
X.LE
X.P
XThe basic structure is that of a reference manual, with basic and
Xstrategy tutorials to the front.  The Table of Contents should prove
Xuseful for quick indexing by subject.
X.H 1 "BASIC INSTRUCTIONS"
X'
X.H 2 "Getting Started"
X'
XThere are some basic commands that you
Xshould be familiar with;
Xrefer to the command chart in Appendix A
Xor the ``?'' command.  Learn all the move keys \- diagonal movement can
Xbe critical.
XThis section discusses the most basic considerations of playing the
Xgame.  The first decision to be made is the choice of character to
Xdo your dirty work.
X'
X.H 2 "Character Classes"
X'
XThe table below lists the various character classes, their equipment
Xand beginning stats.
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,expand,box;
Xc c c c c c
Xl | l | n n n | l.
XClass or Name#Special Items#St#Ac#Hp#Other	
X_
XArchaeologist\(de#pickaxe & icebox#14#7#12
XCave(wo)man\(de#+1 club#18#8#16
XElf# #16#9#16#sword
XFighter\(de# #17#7#14#two-handed sword
XHealer#stethoscope#15#10#16
XKnight\(de#suit of armor#10#3#12#long sword
XNinja# #10#7#15#katana, shurikens
XPriest(ess)#+1 mace, blessed#15#4#13#2 spellbooks
XSamurai# #16#4#16#katana
XTourist\(de#camera (w/flash)#11#10#10#+2 darts, lots of food
XValkyrie#+1 long sword#17#6#16#+3 shield
XWizard\(de# #16#9#15#lots of magic items
X.TE
X.BL
X.LI "\(de"
XDenotes standard Hack character classes.  All others exclusive to
XNethack.  ``Speleologist'' has been renamed ``Archaeologist'' in Nethack.
XBeginning stats shown are also for NetHack.
X.LE
X.P
XEach character has advantages, but some are more unusual than others.
XThe Tourist is a weak human being, but is equipped with a
Xa camera and inexhaustible flash unit that blinds monsters.  The 
XHealer (with a stethoscope to diagnose monsters) and the Tourist
Xare both weak and difficult to keep alive. (The idea
Xis to get by until weapons, armor and magic can be found, so that
Xthe benefits of the peculiar items can be enjoyed.)
XThe Archaeologist/Speleologist starts with a pickaxe
Xto dig and box to keep food.
XThe remaining characters are self-explanatory.
X'
X.H 2 "Words to the Wise"
X'
XConsider the key points that are listed in this section; they may save
Xyou time and frustration.
X.H 3 "Choose an appropriate character."
XTo start out, choose a character that can survive a few beatings while
Xyou learn your way around; the archaeologist/speleologist, healer,
Xtourist and wizard are virtually unarmed and defenseless.  
X.P
X.H 3 "Your best friend is your dog."
XBe patient with your dog; it can save your life.
XYou will notice that he gets in your way and sometimes eats what you
Xwould like to get hold of.  He eats what he needs to, but he leaves
Xfood rations alone unless you throw one to him.  If the message is
Xdisplayed: ``You feel worried
Xabout the dog,'' it means that he is starving.  Throw him a tripe ration,
Xkill something, or (if you can spare it) toss a food ration.
XThe message ``You have a sad feeling for a moment, then it passes,''
Xmeans that your dog has died.
XMany people prefer to leave their dog behind on the first level.
XConsidering that your canine is a match for almost any creature in the
Xdungeon, you are well-advised to keep it around.  A leash
Xallows you to keep the animal with you at all times, but also tends
Xto make him get in your way more often.
X.P
X.H 3 "Don't let the monster get the upper hand."
XWhen moving around or running from monsters, the idea is to give them
Xas few chances as possible to hit you.  If you end a move right
Xnext to a monster, it will have first crack at you.  Some monsters, like
Xleprechauns and bats, can leap an extra space and still hit you.
XWhen moving in a room with monsters in it, plan your moves ahead.  Remember
Xthat you can enter a door only at right angles to the wall, but you can
Xattack to or from a door diagonally.  This applies to monsters too.
X.H 3 "Beware Swarms of Orcs."
XIt is a good idea to use the ``c'' (call) command to name your
Xweapon ``Orcrist.''  This will give you a hitting bonus against the
Xswarms of orcs you will encounter.  Orcs are very common, and if you
Xrun into one, the others aren't far off.
X.H 3 "Where possible, eat what you kill."
XYou must eat food soon after the display indicates you are hungry.
XDead monsters are a necessary supplement to your diet.  Some characters
Xstart off with little or no food.  Not only do corpses ward off
Xstarvation, but some monsters will give you
Xspecial powers.  However, you must be very careful to only eat monsters
Xkilled within the last few turns and eat only those that are safe for
Xconsumption.  (Refer to the section on Food for more details.)
X.P
X.H 3 "In Hack, relief is spelled E-l-b-e-r-e-t-h."
XOne of the most vital tactics in Hack is the use of the E)ngrave command
Xin conjunction with the magic word ``Elbereth.''  When written on the
Xfloor of the dungeon, this word represents a sort of truce with monsters.
XWhen surrounded
Xor close to death, you can ``go under Elbereth,'' as the expression goes,
Xand monsters will not attack again until you strike at them first.
X(There are several exceptions;
Xsee the section on Elbereth under ``Tricks and Other Non-intuitive
XActions'' for detailed instructions.)
X.H 2 "Learning the Ways of Magic"
XAt low levels, you only have to worry about 3 things: your hit points, your
Xfood supply, and dealing with cursed magic that can temporarily cripple you.
XTwo particular items that require great consideration are a wand of
Xwishing and a scroll of genocide.  These items should not be wasted;
Xgive some thought to possible uses before you find one.  There is more
Xthan enough information in this document to aid your decision.
X.P
X.H 3 "Test potions and scrolls carefully."
XWhile playing, it is best to read unknown scrolls and try potions
Xbefore you clear an entire level; scrolls and potions of detection
Xwill yield ``strange feelings'' if there is nothing to detect.
X(You might drop some gold, a magic item, a food item,
Xand ensure that a monster is around before testing to guarantee results.)
XIt is also possible to fling potions at monsters and observe their effects
X(see ``Potions'').
X.P
XIt is not a good idea to test magic when your hit points are really low;
Xscrolls of fire, create monster, and potions of sickness can kill you.
XWith most magic items, after testing you will be 
Xable to identify them the next time you pick one up, or at least have an idea 
Xwhat they are.  If you are prompted to name an object you've just used
X(usually scrolls) this is the name it will be given if you find it again.
XThis document should enable you to recognize these items quickly.
X.P
XIn the case of scrolls, there are three whose action is sufficiently
Xnasty that it is important to take precautions until they have been
Xdiscovered: Damage Weapon, Destroy Armor and Amnesia.  The respective
Xdangers are that your weapon will be ruined, your armor destroyed and
Xyour spells forgotten.  One way to prevent this wanton destruction of
Xyour property is to (prior to reading scrolls) wield an alternate weapon,
Xwear an alternate armor or something over your primary armor, and don't
Xtranscribe spells until you've read the Scroll of Amnesia (``Who was that
XMaude person anyway?'').
X.P
X.H 3 "Zap wands immediately."
XIf they are non-directional you will usually 
Xfind out what it is immediately.  A non-directional wand that doesn't seem to 
Xdo anything is a wand of secret door detection.  You may want to conduct such 
Xtests in a room where you suspect a secret door, but haven't searched it out 
Xyet.  If it asks for a 
Xdirection, hit <space> to cancel, and next time you have a cooperative monster,
Xengrave Elbereth and zap it at the monster in such a way that if it's a
X``bolt'' wand it won't bounce back at you.  (Stand at a diagonal from the
Xmonster.)
XDon't accidentally hit your dog!  
X.P
X.H 3 "Never experiment with rings."
XUse identify scrolls on rings.  Be particularly careful with rings (and
Xweapons and armor for that matter) from a ghost hoard, which are
X\fIstickeycursed\fR, which means that they are not necessarily cursed
Xin the usual sense (with negative enchantment) but they cannot be removed
Xwithout a remove curse.  If, for example, you put on a stickeycursed
Xring of levitation, you won't be able to pick up anything, including
Xa scroll of remove curse.
X.H 1 "STRATEGY"
X.H 2 "Upper Levels"
X.H 3 "Let the dog fight for you when you are badly hurt or outclassed."
XHe is bigger and stronger than you.  Don't steal all his kills;
Xhe can starve to death. He will eat more than he needs, but the more he eats,
Xthe faster he grows into a big dog.  There is no monster except a cockatrice
Xthat a big dog cannot take on with a reasonable chance of survival.  
X.P
XHis body is one guaranteed non-hostile food source, provided you don't 
Xwait so long you die before you can kill him.  (Due to the ``You avoid
Xhitting your dog feature,'' the only way to kill your dog is with
Xa wand or projectile weapon, or hitting him while blind.)  Starvation excepted, 
Xhowever, (and not then if you have an alternative) DO NOT kill your dog 
Xout-of-hand! He may get in the way, but he is a powerful ally.  Also, the
Xminute you eat a dog, every monster on the level will head for you with blood
Xin its eye(s).  There are a few monsters he will not normally attack, such as 
Xshopkeepers, and others that he won't attack until he sees you fighting 
Xthem.  On the other hand, he will immediately attack bats ond orcs.
XA ring of conflict will make him fight anything.
XDon't test wands out on him; your canine is not invulnerable.  
X.P
XIf you meet a wild dog, the best bet is to throw food at him \- anything 
Xyou could eat.  Tripe 
Xis wonderful, but don't bother throwing rotted corpses.
XIf you find a ``wild'' dog above 8th level or so, or a named monster 
Xanywhere, you are on a ghost level.  Watch out for the dog's former owner.
XPlease name your dog, even if it's Ralph. That way, other people will have the 
Xsame advantage if you die and become a ghost.
X.P
XDon't try to maintain more than two tame dogs \- if you get more than 
Xthat, abandon them (save some tripe in case you need to go back to the level)
Xor, if you are powerful enough to face enraged hordes, kill and eat the extras 
Xnext time you're hungry.  Scrolls of 
Xtaming produce tame monsters that should be treated as polymorphed 
Xdogs.  Tame monsters all eat a lot, except the cockatrice, and you can't eat 
Xanything he kills.
X(By the way, if you get a tame cockatrice, DO NOT GO AROUND BAREHANDED!
XIf you are not wearing gloves, wield anything, even an egg! Otherwise, 
Xyou run a terrible risk of bumping into it with your bare hands and
Xbecoming petrified.)
X.P
X.H 3 "Don't get careless."
XA major cause of upper-level fatalities, or
Xfatalities at any level, is not keeping an eye on your hit points.  If you are
Xlow on hit points, freeze with your hands off the keyboard and figure out what
Xto do.  Can you get away from the monster?  Do you have a secret weapon?
XThe first thing to do is often to write Elbereth.  (Magic Markers can be used
Xto create an indestructable Elbereth that works the same as a scare monster
Xscroll; see Magic Marker under ``Tools.'')  Even a puny monster can
Xkill you if you don't watch your hit points.  Monsters to keep an eye on at
Xlow levels are hobgoblins and acid blobs.  If you have 8 or fewer HP,
Xa hobgoblin can kill with one blow.
XGetting killed by acid blobs is always embarrassing,
Xbecause the only way they can hurt you is if you hit them.  Don't chase acid 
Xblobs if you're low on HP.
X.P
X.H 3 "You may want to eat a leprechaun and a floating eye."
XThe first is a matter of preference, since the ability to teleport
Xrandomly can be a blessing and a curse.
XThe latter, your dog will be happy to kill for you,
Xbut you will, as usual when he
Xkills monsters, have to move fast to prevent him from happily eating it for
Xyou.  You should be able to kill a leprechaun by 3rd level or so.
Xin NetHack, wizards gain teleport control at experience level 5, so it
Xis a good idea to eat one.  (Other character classes gain the same
Xability at experience level 10.)
XYou can use a wand to kill a leprechaun,
Xbut if planning an extended visit in the dungeon, just wear him
Xdown hand-to hand, perhaps softening him up with a couple of throwing weapons.
XTo keep him from stealing all your gold, drop it in a corridor, and once you
Xdisturb him, defend the door to that corridor. (Remember, he's much
Xfaster than you are).  If he gets your gold anyway, he and the
Xgold are still somewhere on the level.  Again, the dog may be some help
Xin the fight, but you will have to grab the corpse before he does.
XAnother strategy is to start with dog well away from both you and leprechaun.
XThrow something at leprechaun from 3 squares or so away, and go under Elbereth.
XHe will come up to you, and your dog may fight 
Xhim and kill him at your feet.  This works best with you standing in a door 
Xand your gold behind you in a corridor, and your dog wandering someplace on 
Xthe far side of the room.
X.P
X.H 3 "Try to conserve your missiles and magic."
XYou can just take it slow,
Xand deal with monsters as leisurely as your food supply (including their
Xcontributions) permits.  If you conserve firepower early, then you can use it 
Xagainst tougher monsters when you really need it.  On the 
Xother hand, you might find that your weapons and skill have improved to the 
Xpoint where you can deal with tougher monsters.
XRemember, if you use a potion of extra-healing to gain
X4 HP now, you may not have it when you're down to 10 out of 40 HP.
XA partial exception is wands of wishing.  
XYou need one good weapon, one rustproof armor (or an elven cloak to protect
Xyour armor),
Xmiscellaneous such as 3 tins (usually spinach), or a powerful magic item.
XThis applies to wizards, of course \- other types should wish for whatever they 
Xare short of.  Don't wish for scrolls of genocide just yet, either.  If you
Xare genuinely doing all right, you might save a wish for future needs. 
X.P
XIn NetHack, the presence of spellbooks makes your choices somewhat different.
X(Refer to the section on Spellbooks in the ``Extended Command Set'' section.
X.P
X.H 3 "Do anything to survive."
XIf you are starving and no edible monsters
Xin sight, then kill your dog!  If you are fainting, down to 2 HP, and cornered
Xby a hobgoblin, then zap anything you can, try all your rings, quaff all your 
Xpotions, read all your scrolls.  You might be teleported, or discover a ring
Xof regeneration or a potion of extra healing, or a wand of fire.  If you
Xare killed by the rebound of your magic missile, at least you tried.
X'
X.H 2 "Lower Levels"
X'
X.H 3 "Be prepared for crowded rooms."
XBelow level 8, Throne Rooms, Treasure Zoos and Beehives become regular
Xhazards.  If you are reasonably equipped, you can back into the corridor
Xand fight the monsters one at a time.  If you aren't, it's best to teleport,
Xdrop a scroll of scare monster, or find some way of retreating to a staircase.
XBolt wands and spells can be counted on to kill more than one monster at
Xa time.
XDon't count on Elbereth to save you when you are badly outnumbered.
XIf you've found a ring of conflict, you are well-equipped to
Xhandle the situation, as the monsters will fight amongst themselves.
XDon't wear it constantly; it is only
Xuseful when there are two or more monsters near you and the ring consumes
Xa great deal of energy. 
XIn NetHack, a spell of Charm Monster can be used to turn several monsters
Xto your side; they will behave like dogs and kill your enemies.
X.H 3 "Rob stores; the risk is worth it."
XYou should be robbing stores according to the procedures described in
Xthe section on ``Shops.''  Stealing may seem unethical, but 50 types of
Xmonsters bent on killing you gives you a sense of perspective.
X.H 3 "Don't throw away bad potions."
XThrow them at monsters.  A potion of sickness can do considerable damage.
XYou can also dip your weapon in them.  Save potions of confusion.  (See 
X``Potions.'')
X.H 3 "Genocide with consideration."
XIf you have scrolls (or spell) of genocide, it is best to eliminate
Xxans or, if you're short on missiles, cockatrices.  Don't genocide dragons;
Xyou'll need to eat one if you don't find a ring of fire resistance.
X.H 3 "There are eight truly awful monsters in the dungeon; know them."
XIn order of fearsomeness: Humans (shopkeepers), Dragons, Demons, Ettins, Eels,
XCockatrices, Xans, and in NetHack, Nymphs. 
X.VL 12
X.LI Humans
XWhen angered, nothing lowers your hit points quite like a shopkeeper.
X.LI Dragons
XTheir flames are fearsome and have been known to travel through walls
Xand past boulders.  Even with a ring of fire resistance, beware of
Xboiling potions that have negative effects.  Kill them quickly or run
Xaway fast.
X.LI Demons
XDemons get multiple hits and tend to replicate.  A wand or spell of
Xturn undead works well.  Blessed weapons also fare well.  Use a wand
Xof cancellation to prevent replication.  Demons usually appear when
Xyou are fooling with fountains.
X.LI Ettins
XThey hit hard and fast, doing about the same damage as a shopkeeper.
X.LI Eels
XInvisible, eels hide in muddy pools (}).  When you walk into a room
Xwith pools, a message is displayed ``It looks rather muddy in here.''
XIf you aren't careful, one will quickly pull you in to drown.  If you
Xhave the ability to teleport at will, you will do so automatically.
X.LI
XCockatrices
XTheir touch turns you to stone instantly, their hissing may do the
Xsame, only more slowly.  Dead lizards are useful against them.  The
Xproblem with cockatrices is that, once dead, are still a hazard.
XDon't forget where you left the corpse and don't inadvertantly pick
Xit up.
X.LI Xans
XTheir pricks eventually render you unable to move, collapsed.  Time
Xheals you slowly, but royal jelly (found in hives) restores movement
Xinstantly.  Levitation can be used to avoid xans; they are short
Xcreatures. 
X.LI Nymphs
XThey are much nastier in NetHack than in other games.  Although usually
Xasleep, they can wander and hit so fast that, if you have no handy
Xkiller magic, they can rob you blind.  They teleport instantaneously
Xunless you use a wand of cancellation.  (Think of what could happen to
Xyou if, in two passes, a nymph has stolen your weapon and your armor.)
X.LE
X.H 3 "To win the game, you must go to hell and back."
XYour principal goal, the Amulet of Yendor is found in the center of Hell,
Xguarded by the Wizard of Yendor and his dog, surrounded by a moat.
XOnce below level 26, you will notice there are no stairs going down.
XTo get to hell, you must read a teleport scroll while confused; you will be
Xasked "What level?"  Enter ``40'' and to hell you will go.
XYou will burn to a crisp without fire resistance.
XYou must levitate over the moat or blast the waters with fire and dig
Xthrough the wall to reach the Wizard.
X(If you genocide dogs, the Hell Hound will also be destroyed.)
X.H 1 "ROOMS AND OTHER BAD PLACES"
XRooms can be empty, filled with traps, treacherous pools with eels,
Xor even a beehive.  The types of rooms listed in this section are
Xmuch easier to deal with if you have a ring of conflict to force the
Xdenizens to fight amongst themselves.
X'
X.H 2 "Assorted Shops"
X'
XShops add much of the spice to hack.  Shops
Xare rooms filled with goodies guarded by a shopkeeper. Shops
Xmay specialize in a particular object (armor, weapons, scrolls, wands, rings) or
Xthey may be general (antiques).  There are three things you can do in a shop: 
Xbuy things, sell things, or steal.   
X.P
XBuying things is simple.  You pick up items and p)ay your shopping bill.  
X(Note: prices for magic items are high, but you often may want to buy food or
Xa weapon if you aren't equipped to steal.)
X.P
XSelling things is almost as simple.  You drop (not throw) the items, and if 
Xthe shopkeeper is interested, he will buy it from you.  WARNING: if not 
Xinterested, he may take the item without paying (i.e. the keeper of a
Xbook shop isn't interrested in your mace or potion).
X.P
XStealing is harder.  You must kill or sleep the shopkeeper or get out past 
Xhim.  A nasty but lucrative tactic is to enter a shop, sell everything you can 
Xto him, including extra rings, cursed items, and/or dead monsters, then take 
X(not buy) back everything you want to keep, anything of his you can carry, and 
Xsteal it all, including the gold he paid you.  You will 
Xhave to rely on your brains, not your brawn.  Note that the shopkeeper usually 
Xhas some treasure of his own that may not appear until he is dead.
X.P
X.H 3 "Strategies for dealing with shopkeepers" 
X.BL
X.LI
XTeleport out: keystone kops will immediately pursue you; the shopkeeper
Xwill follow somewhat after, asking "Did you forget to pay?"  Beware the
Xpies thown by the keystone kops;
Xthe shopkeeper will get angry if he gets hit and take it out on you.
X.LI
XDig your way out.  
X.LI
XTeleport the shopkeeper away with a wand of teleportation; just
Xdon't meet him on the way out.
X.LI
XAvoid the shopkeeper: lure the shopkeeper away from the door, then 
Xzap him with a wand of sleep.  Tiptoe around him and make good your
Xescape.
X.LI
XKill the shopkeeper: you better have a wand!  Killing humans is very bad
Xluck.  On the run, these retired barbarians will
Xwipe up the floor with you if they catch you.  They are faster than you and
X\fBthey ignore Elbereth\fR. If you quaff a potion of invisibility, they will stand
Xin front of the door no matter what you shoot or throw.  The shopkeeper
Xknows who's attacking him, and if you get too close, he'll get you.
X.LI
XTrain your dog: this isn't as hard as it sounds. It can be fun if you're not a
Xtaker of risks.  Get your dog inside the shop and sit in the doorway until
Xthe dog puts an object directly in front of you.  You can step forward and
Xtake the item without being charged for it.
XWhen he moves away, toss him a tripe ration.  Having been rewarded,
Xyour dog will will bring other objects to you in the same manner. 
X(Note: the shopkeeper may stand
Xon this critical spot if the dog has displaced him; just be patient.)
X.LI
XIf by some chance you have a shop with a bunch of orcs in the back,
XElbereth one step behind the door, and kill the orcs as they exit the room.
X(You may have to take a step into the room or throw something to wake up the
Xorcs).  The orcs will carry many items outside the shop for you, and you will
Xnot be charged for them. The shopkeeper may not even declare his shop 
Xpillaged.
X.LE
X.P
XShopkeepers have long memories.  They will refuse to let you out
Xof a shop if you have stolen any items from it, even if you are not trying
Xto steal anything on this visit.   Shopkeepers are also crafty enough to
Xstay out of your line of fire, unless you are within 2 spaces of the door. 
XMake sure you have a means of escape before trying anything, since you will
Xhave to pay for or steal anything you use up or get stickeycursed by!  If you 
Xknow which scroll is teleportation, then you can use one of his, but if trying
Xhis scrolls out to find a teleport scroll (don't even try it except in a book
Xstore) you run a risk of being stranded.  Trying wands out in a walking-cane 
Xshop will avoid that problem (since wands are not used up in one shot) but
Xif any wand is fired at, or any ray hits (look out for rebounds) the
Xshopkeeper, he will get mad!  If you really wipe out a shop, the storekeeper
Xwill declare it pillaged, and instead of buying, he will accept contributions.
X.P
X.H 2 "The Magical Memory Vault"
XThis little 2x2 room holds the current
Xbalance of the Magical Memory Bank.  It has no doors connecting it to any
Xroom or corridor on the level.  You may locate it in three ways. 1)
Xread a scroll of gold detection.  The four piles of gold are unmistakable.
X2) read a scroll of magic mapping.  Any 2x2 rooms on the level not
Xconnected to any other rooms will be a Magic Memory vault.  3) stumble
Xupon one.
X.P
XThere are three ways of getting to a Magical Memory vault.
X1) teleport in.  This is the fastest way in, but will you be able to get out
Xagain? 2) use a wand of digging. 3) Find the phrase ``ad ae?ar um''
X(Latin: \fIad aerarium\fR,``to the money.'') and search it until
Xyou find a passage that contains a ``single-use'' teleport trap and use it.
X.P
XIf you stay in a vault too long, a guard will come by and ask you
Xto identify yourself, and if he doesn't know you,
Xto drop all your gold.  If you have no way to teleport out or defeat
Xthe guard, you lose both your money and the money you've stolen.
XThe key is to identify yourself as ``Croesus'' (as in ``Rich as Croesus.'').
XThe guard will then leave you to your looting.
X.P
XIn some older versions of Hack (1.0.3) it is also possible to
Xdeal with the guard this way:
X.AL
X.LI
XDrop your gold, and move one step toward the guard (once he
Xgives you room).  He will move a step down the corridor.
X.LI
XTake a step back to pick up the gold; the guard will stay put.
X.LI
XStep toward the guard again, till you are next to him (Don't
Xhit him!).  Drop gold again.  He will advance again.  
X.LI
XRepeat until guard reaches end of corridor, where he will disappear.
X.LE
X'
X.H 2 "David's Treasure Zoo"
X'
XThe zoo corresponds to a monster room (sometimes know as ``party rooms'')
Xin Rogue.  There are some differences: A zoo is packed with monsters,
Xexcept for the row facing the door.  There are no magic items, (except for 
Xwhat materializes when you kill a monster) but a pile of gold is under
Xevery monster.  Monsters in a zoo are best dealt with with a ring of 
Xconflict, but zapping a missile wand (fire, cold, magic missile, death,
Xetc.) will kill many monsters.  Otherwise, you better run as fast as 
Xyou can away from the zoo and come back when you are better prepared.
XBest thing is to use Elbereth and a strong wand.  If a
Xleprechaun is in the zoo,
Xwhen you use a wand or a ring of conflict, he will go around picking up the
Xgold left by dead monsters.  When he has all the gold, he will teleport, which
Xis wise of him, because he is carrying a lot of gold.
XOrcs will also pick up gold but, or course, can't teleport.
X'
X.H 2 "Hives"
X'
XLairs filled with killer bees.  Asleep at first, they will swarm if
Xyou remain long.  Hives have several lumps of royal jelly, a substance
Xthat simultaneously fills your stomach, heals and increases strength.
XIt also heals the effect of xan pricks.
X'
X.H 2 "The Morgue"
X'
XThese are filled with ghosts with strange names.  When
Xyou disturb their rest, they file out and attack.  Note that these
Xghosts are not of former players.
X'
X.H 2 "Throne Rooms"
X'
XLike Treasure Zoos, Throne Rooms are packed with monsters.  In order to
Xget a crack at the throne, you must clear some of them.  A ring of
Xconflict is useful.  When you approach the throne, use the # sit command
Xif you dare.
XAlthough the message ``you feel somehow out of place...'' is always displayed
Xwhen sitting down, there is a one in three chance that something will happen.
XAs with fountains, after a random number of operations, the throne disappears:
X``The throne vanishes in a puff of logic.''
X.P
X.S 9 10
X.TS H
Xtab (#), center, box;
Xc c
Xl l.
XMessage#Effect
X_
X.TH
X``you feel suddenly weaker.''#Lose 1-2 strength, plus hp damage
X``you feel suddenly stronger.''#Gain strength
X``A massive charge of electricity shoots through your body!''#Electrocution, great damage
X``you feel much, much better!''#Cure all
X``you notice you have no gold!''#That's correct
X``you feel your luck is changing.''#Adds to luck or grants a wish
X``an image forms in your mind.''#Magic mapping
X``your vision sharpens.''#See invisible
X``you feel threatened.''#Aggravate monster
X``you feel a wrenching sensation.''#Teleportation
X``you are granted a gift of insight!''#Identify pack
X``your mind turns into a pretzel!''#Confusion
X_
X``you hear a voice echo:''#[Three possible:]
X``Your audience has been summoned, Sire!''#A nasty monster appears
X``By your Imperious order Sire...''#Genocide
X``A curse upon you for sitting upon this most holy throne!''#Blindness or curse pack items
X.TE
X.S
X'
X.H 2 "Mazes"
X'
XMazes are found on the lowest levels of the
Xdungeon.  The exact level may vary depending on your version of hack.  
XThe maze takes up the entire level, and is inhabited by a variety of
Xstrong monsters.  One peculiarity of the maze is that there are no 
Xstaircases down.  All staircases in mazes lead up, even if you had just
Xascended the staircase from a lower level.  The only way to get to the second
Xor greater maze levels is to fall several levels through a trapdoor.  Even 
Xthen, you will have to repeat the fall if you want to return. You may wish to 
Xsave a scroll of mapping for the maze, especially if you possess a ring of 
Xteleport control. Also useful are potions of object detection (see Amulet),
Xmonster detection, and blindness (if you have telepathy).
XEvery maze is inhabited by a minotaur (m) who carries a wand of digging.
XIt is rumored that a wand of wishing can be found on a particular level.
X'
X.H 2 "Traps"
X'
XThere are various types of traps, designed to injure, incapacitate,
Xor relocate you.
X.VL 22
X.LI "dart trap"
XSmall damage, rarely poisoned.
X.LI "arrow trap"
XGreater damage, rarely poisoned.
X.LI "pit trap"
XSmall damage, temporary imprisonment. Greater damage if spikes are
Xpresent.
X.LI "bear trap"
XLittle damage, temporary imprisonment.
X.LI "sleeping gas trap"
XSleeping gas is dangerous during battle; you can die while asleep.
XLasts several turns.
X.LI "teleport trap"
XSend you to random spot on same level.
X.LI "level teleport trap"
XSends you to a random lower level. Message reads: ``You
Xare momentarily blinded by a flash of light.'' It is quite possible to
Xteleport to level 30, where, if you do not have fire resistance or a
Xring of fire resistance on your finger (in your pack does you no good!)
Xthe message is displayed: ``You arrive at the center of the earth \-
XUnfortunately that is where hell is located \- You burn to a crisp.''
X.LI trapdoor
XDrops you to the next level.
X.LI "squeaky board"
XMakes a sharp sound that alerts monsters to your presence.
X.LI "anti-magic field"
XDrains some of your magic energy.
X.LI "water trap"
XSquirts water that can rust your weapons and armor.
X.LI "magic trap"
XHas several effects, some which are familiar, but not all of which are
Xreal.  The following is a list of messages associated with magic 
Xtraps and their meanings.  The most common effect is a blinding flash
Xof light followed by the creation of one or more monsters around you.
X.LE
X.TS
Xexpand, tab(#), center, box;
Xc c
Xl l.
XMessage#Effect
X_
X``You are momentarily blinded by a flash of light.''#Blindness; create monster
X``You yearn for your distant homeland.''#No effect
X``Your pack shakes violently!''#No effect
X``A shiver runs up and down your spine.''#No effect
X``You hear a distant howling.''#No effect
X``You hear a deafening roar!''#Create monster
X``You feel someone is helping you.''#Lift curse
X``You feel charismatic.''#Tames monsters around you
X``You feel in touch with the Universal Oneness.''#Lift curse (hallucinating)
X``You feel like you need some help.''#Lift curse (hallucinating)
X``A tower of flame bursts from the floor.''#Reduces hit point maximum
X.TE
X.P
XYou can still fight and use Elbereth from bear and pit traps.
XAll traps can be discovered by searching, or by passing near with a
Xring of searching.  A wand of secret door detection may also find them.
X'
X.H 2 "Fountains"
X'
XYou can drink (quaff) from fountains or dip things in them.  The water
Xmay bestow certain benefits, but such instances are rare.  Most of the
Xtime you will find ``The cool draught refreshes you.''  Sometimes a gem
Xwill appear.  There is a small
Xchance of causing the fountain to overflow.  When this happens, stay clear
Xof the pools, which are displayed as ``}'' (rather than as fountains,
X``{'').  If you step into one, you will certainly drown, unless you
Xhave teleport ability. (The game automatically attempts teleportation
Xwhen drowning.)  It is also possible to unleash Demons; this
Xis likely to be very unlucky.  (See ``Monsters.'')
XDipping a long sword can be useful (see ``Excalibur'') but there may be
Xsome initial damage and enchantment may not be achieved before the fountain
Xdries up.  The best procedure seems to be going under Elbereth before
Xdipping.  You may see several messages, as summarized here:
X.P
X.so fount.tbl
X.H 1 "FOOD"
X'
X.H 2 "Hunger, Weakness and Death"
X'
XIn Rogue, it is best not to eat until the message ``You feel weak'' is
Xdisplayed.  Not so with Hack (and especially NetHack).  Your strength
Xdrops by one point when the ``weak'' message is displayed, and there
Xmay be lasting effects.  Eat when you are hungry.  If you
Xeat two food rations in a row, or an enormous amount of other stuff, you will
Xbecome Satiated ('You're having a hard time getting all that food down').
X\fBDo not eat while satiated\fR.  You may choke and die.
X'
X.H 2 "Monsters"
X'
XEating fresh-killed monster corpses is good for saving your 
Xrations.  However, some are poisonous, and all rot after a short time.  
XEating some monster corpses will give special abilities or effects (see 
Xthe table at the end of this section),
Xbut may simultaneously do poison damage.  Eating rotted (tainted) 
Xcorpses is lethal within 20 turns at most, unless you have a handy healing or 
Xextra-healing potion. If you do, drink it fast. Poison resistance will not
Xprotect against rotted corpses.
X'
X.H 2 "Food Items"
X'
XAside from monsters, food seems to keep forever.  Most 
Xnamed items have little food value.  Food rations however, are a super
Xfood which will take you from fainting to healthy in one shot.  Some pancakes
Xalso seem to do this.  Fortune cookies contain hints from a rumor file.
XIgnore ``clues'' to next level; they are random.  Hints about monsters, methods,
Xetc. are usually good.  Tripe is dog food.  If you eat it, it will usually
Xbehave as a food ration, but you may throw up, and be left only slightly
Xbetter (or worse) than you started.  Small food items can at least delay
Xstarvation. Carrots will cure blindness, and a clove of garlic can be
Xwielded against a vampire.  A few food
Xitems (random) are rotten. There is not much you can do about this or the 
Xminor effects that it may have, but be warned that rotten things have 
Xonly 1/4 the food value.
X'
X.H 2 "Tins"
X'
XTins take a while to open, and
Xyou will automatically stop opening the tin if a monster approaches
X(even if you are under Elbereth).
XTins may contain apple juice (useless) peaches (food), 
Xrotten meat (causes you to vomit) unknown substance (disgustingly nutritious)
Xand the important stuff, spinach.  This miracle weed increases your strength  
Xby a random but potentially large amount.  Two or three of them will 
Xalmost certainly turn you into a hulk. Note that monsters will interrupt
Xyour opening it.  If you don't have a can opener, axes, crysknives, and
Xdaggers help speed up the process of opening tins.  To help you, though, they 
Xhave to be wielded, and if you wield a stickeycursed dagger, tough luck.
X'
X.H 2 "Food Attribute Index"
X'
XLevels: satiated, not hungry, hungry, weak, fainting.
X.sp
XBelly limit: 1499 units
X.sp
XInitial food in belly: 900 units.
X.sp
XProbability of rotten food (unless fortune cookie or dead monster): 1/7
X.sp
XConsequences of rotten food:
X.TS
Xtab(#),center;
Xc c
Xl l.
XChance#Result
X_
X1 in 4#confusion (2d4)
X3 in 16#blindness (2d10) (if not blind already)
X3 in 16#loss of consciousness (1-10)
X3 in 8#no harm
X.TE
XValue of rotten food: 1/4 normal value.
X.sp
XEating restores 1 strength point unless it leaves you weak or satiated.
X.P
X.so food.tbl
X.P
XIt is possible to use polymorph to change food items.  When you kill Kops
Xor giants you get cream pies.  They are relatively light and you can
Xcarry many.  When you are hungry simply zap a number (2-3) pies into
Xfood rations.  This allows you to carry a lot of food. (It is a good
Xidea to always have at least one food ration because you may not be
Xable to cast.)  You can also polymorph dead bodies with this spell. 
X.H 1 "MONSTERS"
X'
X.H 2 "Monster Data Index"
X'
X.so monster.tbl
X.P
X.H 2 "Descriptions"
X.LB 4 0 0 2 a
X.LI
XAcid Blob:  Not edible.  Does not attack unless confused, but when you hit 
Xit it may splash you with acid or corrode your weapon or armor.  (Elven
Xcloaks and leather armor are not affected.) Worth 9 XP; good for 
Xbuilding your levels at first.  However, an acid splash can do as much 
Xas 8 points of damage.  They are slow and easy to avoid.  If one is 
Xblocking your path in a corridor or door, you can lead it into a room 
Xand dodge around it.
X.LI
XGiant Beetle: Edible.  Nothing else special.
X.LI
XCockatrice: Very dangerous!  Any hit will turn you to stone.  Even if it
Xmisses, it has a one in five chance to do so by hissing.  Touching a 
Xdead cockatrice is also lethal, unless you are wearing gloves.  If you 
Xthrew things at it, do not try to retrieve them until detect food 
Xtells you there is no corpse underneath.  Don't even think of 
Xeating it.  Gloves allow you to handle dead cockatrices, but not 
Xnecessarily safely (see gloves).  A monster 
Xturned to stone by a living cockatrice eventually become a
Xpile of rocks.  Monsters you hit with a dead one 
Xseem to be normal corpses.
XThe wand of cancellation does not stop the petrification.
XTypically, the process begins with a message about
Xyour limbs stiffening.  Eating a dead lizard has been known to
Xprevent petrification.
X.LI
XDog: your dog, or that of a previous adventurer.  If you throw tripe or
Xanything else edible (not rotted corpses) at a wild dog, it becomes tame.
XIf you leave a tame dog alone on a level, it instantly goes wild.  To
Xtake a tame dog to another level, use stairs when it is adjacent to you.
XA tame dog will not attack you unless it is confused.
XIt can starve to death, and for a while near the end will be confused
Xby hunger.  If you get ``Sad feelings'' it means 
Xthat your dog has died or been killed.  If you feel ``worried'' it means 
Xthat it's dangerously hungry.  Dogs are surprisingly powerful.  Note: 
Xif the dog falls down a trap door, it will still be tame \- it only 
Xgoes wild when deserted.  Little dogs grow to be big dogs as the game 
Xwears on.  There is nothing except a cockatrice that a big dog cannot
Xat least argue with, and have a reasonable chance of killing.  It seems
Xto kill only for food, with a few exceptions such as acid blobs and
Xsometimes kobolds.  If you are fighting something and it has a high 
Xloyalty quotient, it may get the idea.  
XNOTE: Dogs will not step on a cursed object.  Thus you can drop a
Xcursed object (rings do well in a passageway or door and the dog will not
Xfollow. Later, come back and get him, no worse for the wear. 
X(CAVEAT: This may apply only to stickeycursed items.)
X.LI
XEttin: in D&D, hard to surprise.  In hack, hard to kill (meaner than a troll).
X.LI
XFog Cloud: edible, weak, but difficult to kill. 24XP. A real bargain.
X.LI
XGelatinous cube: Occasionally paralyzes. 23XP.
X.LI
XHomunculus: bite can put you to sleep. (Rare for wizards) Not edible.
X.LI
XImp:  Poor attack, but hard to hit.  You might starve to death trying 
Xto kill one.  Edible.
X.LI
XJaguar: has multiple attacks, but does not inflict much damage. 
X.LI
XKiller Bee:  Like orcs, this denizen of the dungeon appears in swarms.
XIf you get hit, you may find that the bee's sting is poisoned.  If 
Xyou haven't already eaten a killer bee or a scorpion, doing so
Xwill give you permanent resistance to poison.  They also are created
Xin swarms by create monster.  Unlike orcs, these are individually
Xmedium-tough monsters, and there is no Orcrist for them.  Poison resistance,
Xhowever, takes the sting out of them.
X.LI
XLeocrotta: The leocrotta is a master of hit and run tactics.  He tends to 
Xtake three hits and then step back.  The leocrotta is a real headache 
Xwhen you are fighting other monsters.
X.LI
XMinotaur: The minotaur is the king of the mazes that exist on the lowest
Xlevels of the dungeon (~27+).  One of these bull-headed creatures
Xcan be found in each maze level. Kill him and you will find a wand of 
Xdigging.
X.LI
XNurse: tends to a wear a ring, but not always.
XIf you remove your armor and go barehanded,
Xshe heals you and raises your maximum hit points.
XNOTE: Elbereth works to stop her either way.  You can either be truly
Xdefenseless, heal yourself, or fight her.  Try to avoid her until you
Xhave cleared the level.  It is bad luck to kill a nurse.
X.LI
XOwlbear: If the owlbear gets a good hit on you, he will embrace you in a
Xbear hug!  You are then unlikely to be able to escape from its 
Xclutches short of killing it or teleporting away.
X.LI
XPiercer: can drop from ceiling by surprise.
XIf it falls and hits you, it might do up to 30+HP damage.
XOnce on the ground, however, is not much of a problem.
XOne of the prime reasons to wear a helmet in hack. Edible. 10XP.
XA hanging (hidden) piercer can be found by searching.
X.LI
XQuivering Blob: Edible.  Weak and slow.
X.LI
XGiant Rat or Rockmole\(dg: Both are edible.  Rockmoles bore into walls
Xand corridors, making new passages.
X.LI
XGiant Scorpion or Spider\(dg: poisonous sting. Edible
Xfor poison resistance.
XLike snakes, scorpions and spiders hide
Xunder objects.  You can turn this to your advantage by throwing
Xmissiles at them from across the room.  They will hide under the first
Xone, then sit still for you to hit with many more.  Beware of spider
Xwebs.
X.LI
XTengu: The tengu tends to engage in guerilla tactics (like the leocrotta).
XTengus teleport short distances while in melee, and may even be able
Xto follow you if you teleport away.
X.LI
XUnicorn: DON'T fight! this is a good guy.  Throw gems at it.  If the gems
Xare valuable, the unicorn will give you something valuble.  Throw a gem
Xdirectly at it and it "graciously accepts your gift."  This raises
Xyour luck 5 points, which is useful. It won't tell you
Xthis, however.  If you throw worthless glass at it, it will be insulted
Xand refuse the gift.  Like the albatross, it is unlucky to kill one.
X.LI
XViolet Fungi: slow, edible.  Sticks to you.
X.LI
XLong Worm or Wumpus: Has a long body (~) behind a head (w).
XOnly the head can hit,
Xthough you can hit (and destroy) the worm at any segment. Hitting
Xthe last segment is by far the best approach.
XYou can get a worm tooth out of the corpse. Enchanting that will
Xproduce a crysknife, a powerful weapon. 
XLong worms tend to hit in long bursts; you may get one that
Xjust sits there while you hit it a few times and then hit you 10 or
Xmore times.  The worm scores hits in quantity rather than quality.
XAvoid attacking the midsection.
XThis can divide the long worm in half, creating two short worms.
XIt is possible to halve a worm, then split each of 
Xthe halves.
XFind a good running loop (two doors on the same side of a room
Xthat connect through tunnel) and sneak around to whack at its tail. 
XYou do not have to kill every single segment to kill the whole worm.  
XIt is worth 115XP.
X.P
XSome versions of Hack have the wumpus, a strong creature without
Xthe complications of the long worm.
X.LI
XXan: pricks your leg. More than one prick ruins your load-carrying
Xcapacity. Potion of speed or lump or royal jelly will cure.
XA real hazard.  Found under
X20th level. Good candidate for genocide.  A ring of levitation allows
Xyou to rise above them; they are very short.
X.LI
XYellow light: if it hits, it will blind you and disappear.  Blindness is
Xtemporary (much shorter than from a potion of blindness).
X(See Floating Eye, and potion of blindness.)
X.LI
XZruty: nothing special.  Hits a lot. 
X.LE
X.LB 3 0 0 2 A
X.LI
XGiant Ant: poisonous sting can lower your strength.  Moves several times
Xin one turn.
X.LI
XGiant Bat: jumps around.  Not powerful, but so fast that it can hit you and
Xget out of hand-to-hand range. Eating corpse causes confusion like
Xpotion. (No warning message.) Good as dog treat, though.
X.LI
XCentaur: Fast and powerful.  Edible, but corpse is heavy.
X.LI
XDragon: A mega-monster.  Nasty attack or breathes fire. The second best reason
Xto own a ring of fire resistance at low levels.  You may also do
Xit the hard way; eating a dragon's corpse 
Xwill give you permanent fire resistance. Unfortunately, a dragon's
Xcorpse is an unliftable object. Dragons can flame you even through walls
Xand past boulders,
Xthough probably won't hit you. This is particularly common in mazes (level 27+).
XA dragon at the back of a zoo can be useful \- they flame at you, and
Xtake out any intervening monsters.  Dragons can flame you through 
XElbereth.  Note that even with fire resistance, the dragon's flames
Xcan cause your scrolls to burn and your potions to explode on you.
X.LI
XFloating Eye: Gaze can paralyze you, leaving you game for monsters.  It 
Xcannot do this unless you attack it hand-to-hand.  Eating corpse makes 
Xyou sick but bestows telepathy; whenever you are blind, you
Xknow what and where every monster on the level is.  This turns yellow 
Xlights and potions of blindness into potential godsends when you have
Xmost of the level mapped out.  To get corpse without getting frozen, 
Xstand next to it while your dog kills it, then grab corpse before he 
Xeats it. (Note for Tourists: use your camera to blind it. A blinded 
Xfloating eye cannot defend itself.)  If your dog is deceased, throw
Xthings at it.  Unaffected by wand of cancellation. Wand of invisibility
Xprevents them from paralyzing just as blindness does.
X.LI
XFreezing Sphere: eating corpse gives protection from cold as ring, but
Xpermanent (may do poison damage).  Usually gives you a blast.
XYou may kill a freezing sphere with projectiles/ray wands or missile
Xweapons. Exploding freezing spheres leave no bodies. It is 
Xeasy to kill at a distance (two crossbow bolts). Ring of cold
Xresistance will protect you from explosions, as will having eaten a
Xsphere corpse.
X.LI
XGnome: edible.
X.LI
XHobgoblin: edible \- good food source.  Attack can do up to 8 points 
Xof damage. 
X.LI
XInvisible Stalker: this monster is invisible; the letter is what you
Xsee with ring or potion of see invisible. (Or telepathy)
XEating corpse confuses you and/or allows you to see invisible
Xthereafter (not to mention turn you invisible for a while!)
X.LI
XJackal: usually edible, but seems to rot fast, or perhaps sometimes start
Xa bit rotten, though not enough to kill you, just confuse you. 
X.LI
XKeystone Kop: The guys that come to get you when you rob a store.  Do not
Xeat them!  They are poisonous.  Keep their pies, though.  Killing a
XKop is bad luck.  Pies blind you temporarily, which isn't bad if you
Xhave telepathy.  There is a # wipe command.  Their numbers seem to increase
Xwith the amount stolen.
X.LI
XLeprechaun: if it hits while you are carying gold, will do no damage but 
Xwill teleport away with a lot of gold.  If it hits while you have
Xno gold, does damage.  Can also pick up piles of gold, even from under 
Xyour feet. Eating corpse may do poison damage, but bestows teleportation
Xas with the ring, but permanently. Usually have a pile of gold on them, 
Xincluding any they took from you. Good for building up experience in
Xthe lowest levels (40+ XP).
X.LI
XMimic: Poses as object in shop or elsewhere.  Step outside shop, the items
Xthat vanish are mimics.  Once they hit you, they can prevent you from
Xmoving off the square until they are dead (or you teleport away).
XEdible. (When eaten, you mimic a treasure chest for 30 turns)
XIn shops, mimics are usually seen as inverted armor, i.e.
Xarmor is ``['' and mimics ``].''
XMimics often mimic doorways (+) or chests of gold ($).  They can be 
Xdiscovered by searching, including the ring.  Wand of cancellation will
Xalso show them up.
X.LI
XNymph: Seduces you and swipes many possessions, including at least one armor
Xthat she talked you into taking off.  Or, may just grab an item.  
XEither way, she teleports away.  Eating corpse is just like eating a
Xleprechaun corpse.  Kill her, and you get your possessions back.  Ignores
XElbereth. (But see ring of adornment.)  You may ignore her charms if 
Xyou zap her with a wand of cancellation. (NetHack nymphs are very fast and
Xcan pick you clean after a few encounters \- stay away from them.)
X.LI
XOrc: Always appear in swarms.  If you see one, there are others.
XEdible in NetHack.  May have personal treasure.  Scroll 
Xand wand of monster creation (but not polymorph) may create 8-9 of 
Xthem. Call your weapon Orcrist and whack away.  Can carry items around
Xthat they find on the floor, i.e. in shops.
X.LI
XPurple Worm: Not that hard to deal with, by the time you get to that
Xlevel. They swallow and digest like the trapper, but
Xyou faster, and towards the end you cannot hit.  This is
Xtheir main attack, and it is dangerous.
X.LI
XQuasit or Quantum Mechanic\(dg: Fast (3 spaces and/or attacks per move),
Xbut little damage per blow.  Quantum mechanics will teleport you with
Xthe message ``You are uncertain of your position.''
X.LI
XRust Monster:  Rusts armor when it hits.  Items that will rust: all armor
X(except leather) and helmets.  Elven
Xcloaks, shields, and gloves are unaffected.  An elven cloak will
Xprotect the armor underneath it from rusting.  Note that once you 
Xstart taking off your armor, he cannot harm it, unlike rogue. Takes no 
Xhit points. Try wand of cancellation.  An item may only be rusted to
X-3.
X.LI
XSnake: can hide under items on floor.  Can appear in numbers from fountains.
X.LI
XTroll: in D&D and rogue, regenerates its wounds. Hack Trolls do not seem
Xto be as nasty as rogue Trolls. Several hits per move.
X.LI
XUmber Hulk: chance of confusing you (as potion) if you catch sight of it. 
XSave a potion of blindness (and a potion of healing) for the umber
Xhulk if you detect him beforehand.  Unlike rogue, umber hulks seem
Xto have more than one chance of confusing you.
X.LI
XVampire: Hits from the vampire reduce your maximum hit points,
Xwhich is almost as unpleasant as wraiths.
XYou can drive a vampire away with one hit while wielding a clove of 
Xgarlic.
X.LI
XWraith: in D&D, drains one level/hit. Drops you an experience level if it
Xgets in a good hit. In extreme cases, may take several levels if it
Xhits well several times. When you kill it, you will go back up one
Xlevel if you've lost any (but won't get the extra experience points).
XWraiths usually don't drain levels if you have good armor;
XEat corpse to gain experience level \- one of the fastest and easiest 
Xways to increase your level.
X.LI
XXorn: In Hack, a xorn is a tough monster, about the same as 
Xattacking a ettin.
X.LI
XYeti: gives cold resistance when eaten.
X.LI
XZombie: edible.
X.LI @)
XHuman (you, shopkeeper or guard): Shopkeepers guards will kill you if you
Xmake them mad. They are tough
Xand ignore Elbereth. If you teleport out with unpaid
Xitems, they will pursue you.
XSee shops under other for ways of dealing
Xwith them.  Don't try to genocide shopkeepers.  Genociding shopkeepers 
Xgenocides all humans (@). You are a human and thus will vanish too.
XKilling humans, including shopkeepers or guards, 
Xreduces your luck, an internal variable. It also kills telepathy.
X(but you can then regain it in the usual manner).
XEating a shopkeeper produces the message: ``You cannibal! You'll be
Xsorry for this!''
XYou may encounter a shop on a ghost level that has been robbed by the
Xghost. In that case, the shopkeeper is likely to take your money for 
Xthe items stolen by the ghost and even kill you if he's still angry.
X.LI ,)
XTrapper: The trapper possesses a unique attack
X\- it simply swallows and digests you.  After being swallowed by a
Xtrapper, you will get the message ``The trapper digests you'' about
Xevery third turn. You can still hit him from within, and stand a
Xgood chance of killing him. If you don't, after about six (6)
Xsuch messages you will get the message "The trapper digests you
Xtotally!".  If such is the case, better luck with your next character.
XIf you have been swallowed by a trapper, you may polymorph it into 
Xsome other creature whose digestive tract may be less hostile.  
XWands of digging will blast through his
Xstomach, leaving him very weak. Two bolts of cold didn't seem to
Xfaze him too much. Teleport out if you can. When teleporting out of a 
Xtrapper, a ring of teleport control will let you choose where you want 
Xto go as usual, but not let you see the level while choosing.
XA wand of teleport monster will take you with the trapper. 
X.P
XDigesting seems to be cumulative, so if you escape one trapper
Xafter 5 digesting messages, be very wary of being swallowed by
Xanother trapper. He may digest you totally in one turn.
X.LI &)
XDemon: a monster with strength second only to the purple worm,
Xwith a high armor class and good magic 
Xresistance. (Note: demons are not resistant
Xto fire.)  Demons replicate; one demon will 
Xgive rise to a second, and a third, etc.  The way to deal with this is 
Xto back the bunch (or perhaps even just the original) into a dead-end
Xand start hacking away. Replicas cannot appear unless there is room next
Xto the replicator. This could also be useful when you have some spare
Xfirepower and need some experience points.
XA wand of cancellation will stop or prevent replication.
XThe wand of undead turning makes them turn tail and run.
X.LI ~)
XLurker Above: another swallowing creature.
X.LI :)
XChameleon:  Whereas the mimic will mimic objects, the chameleon will
Xmimic other monsters.  When hard pressed, the chameleon will
Xrevert to its original form. Also unlike the mimic, the chameleon
Xchanges form constantly. So if you see a monster, and then look
Xagain and see a different one, it's probably a chameleon.
XChameleons have all the powers of the monsters 
Xthey emulate. If you see a genocided monster, it is a chameleon.
X.LI "`` '')"
X(a space) Ghost: incredibly hard to hit.  Does little damage.  Always has
X``ghost hoard'' that can be obtained by killing the ghost
Xor by sneaking around it.  Remember all items in these hoards are
Xstickeycursed.
XSneaking around a ghost is easier than destroying it, because they
Xmove slowly and do little damage per hit. Find a good running loop.
XDon't get caught in a dead end \- you'll either get killed or starve
Xto death.  If you're getting clobbered by a ghost, do not retreat
Xtoward an up staircase!  If a ghost kills you, you may become a ghost
Xon the same level.  If many people are ``ghosted''
Xthere, future dungeon-delvers face the grim prospect of several ghosts and
Xtheir dogs!  This can get them killed before they can escape, which
Xaggravates the problem. (It may be advisable to ask root or the games
Xmanager to remove a \fIbones.n\fR level that has reached absurd proportions.)
XIn addition, If you are about to die on a ghost level, drop
Xeverything; When you become a ghost, your hoard will not be stickeycursed
XGhosts are surprisingly easy to kill if you have a lot of experience
X(level 11+). Worth 175XP.
X.LI ;)
XGiant Eel\(dg: Rumor has it that eels hide under mud and that a unicorn
Xcan clear the water so that you can see them.  They wrap themselves around
Xyou and pull you into the mud to drown.
X.LI 1)
XWizard of Yendor: Guardian of the Amulet, a powerful wizard who may
Xnot stay dead (NetHack).
X.LI 2)
XMail Daemon: You won't get a crack at this one; this creature delivers
Xscrolls of mail to you and quickly departs.
X.LI 9)
XGiant: Powerful creature found on lower levels.  Eating one increases
Xyour strength.
X.LE
X.H 1 "WEAPONS AND ARMOR"
X.H 2 "Weapons"
X.P
X.so weapon.tbl
X'
X.H 2 "Armor Items"
X'
X.TS
Xbox, center, tab (#);
Xc c c c c
Xl n n n n.
XName#Chance#Weight#Ac#Protection
X_
Xhelmet#3#1#9#0
Xplate mail#5#5#3#2
Xsplint mail#7#5#4#1
Xbanded mail#9#5#4#0
Xchain mail#10#5#5#1
Xscale mail#10#5#6#0
Xring mail#12#5#7#0
X.TE
X.sp
X The armors below do not rust.
X.TS
Xbox, center, tab (#);
Xc c c c c
Xl n n n n.
XName#Chance#Weight#Ac#Protection
X_
Xstudded leather#12#3#7#1
Xelfin chain mail#1#1#5#3
Xbronzeplate mail#6#5#4#0
Xcrystalplate mail#1#5#3#2
Xleather armor#15#3#8#0
Xelven cloak#5#0#9#3
Xshield#3#0#9#0
Xpair of gloves#1#1#9#0
X.TE
X.P
XProtection refers to magical effects.
X.P
X.H 3 "Elven Cloaks"
XMagic cloaks that increase your
Xarmor class by one and protect you from
Xenchantments.  Elven cloaks do protect your armor from being
Xdissolved by rust monsters or acid blobs. They can be enchanted.
X.H 3 "Helmets"
XProne to digestion by rust monsters,
Xbut they protect you from piercers and from rocks dropping on you
Xin mazes (if you get that far).
X.H 3 "Gloves"
XThese normally improve your armor class by one, but
Xtheir greatest advantage is in preventing you from getting stoned by cockatrice
Xcadavers.  If you have a wand of wishing, ask for ``a pair of +3 gloves.''
XGloves allow you to pick up and even wield
Xcockatrice cadavers, turning monsters
Xto stone right and left until the corpse rots away.
XThis tactic is not recommended because is very hazardous. If you 
Xsubsequently fall down the stairs (as is usual when heavily loaded) you will 
Xtouch the cadaver and die. Note also that this is inconsiderate of other
Xplayers, as any player taking your hoard will encounter
Xthe cockatrice cadaver before they reach the gloves you were using.  If you
Xhave a second pair of gloves, please put them at the bottom of your inventory,
Xand the cockatrice at the top, except of course for the gloves you are 
Xwearing. (drop items above it, then pick them up again).
XAny grave-robber should reach your spare pair and be overloaded before 
Xhe hits the cadaver, allowing him to put on the gloves.  Note that the cadaver 
Xwill eventually rot away, so don't throw away your weapon.
X.H 3 "Armor"
XVarious types of armor have different basic armor classes, and
Xany given suit may have a plus or minus in addition.  Minused armor (including
Xthe other items under this heading) is almost always stickeycursed.  Note that
Xmost armor takes some time to put on or take off, and that once you start 
Xeither process, you will follow through no matter what is attacking you.
X.H 1 "SCROLLS, POTIONS, RINGS AND WANDS"
X'
X.H 2 " Scrolls"
X'
XUnless stated otherwise, all scrolls identify themselves.  
XException: detect scrolls will give a ``strange feeling'' if there are none of 
Xtheir objects on the level, and enchant/damage/destroy weapons/armor will do
Xthe same if you are not wearing any of the item affected.
X.P
XAll scrolls give strange effects when confused or hallucinating.
X.P
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,box;
Xc c c c
Xl n | l n.
XName#Chance#Name#Chance
X_
Xenchant armor#6#genocide#2#
Xdestroy armor#5#light#10
Xconfuse monster#5#teleportation#5
Xscare monster#4#gold detection#4
Xblank paper#3#food detection#1
Xremove curse#6#identify#18
Xenchant weapon#6#magic mapping#5
Xdamage weapon#5#amnesia#3
Xcreate monster#5#fire#5
Xtaming#1#punishment#1
X.TE
X.P
X.AL
X.LI
Xgenocide: everyone's favorite scroll.
XAlso prevents 
Xthe creation by scroll or wand of more monsters of the type.
XNote that genociding cockatrices does not remove their cadavers (so you
Xstill have to watch those ghost treasure hoards).
XAlso, you can't genocide monsters represented by punctuation
Xmarks (chameleons :, trappers , , demons &, lurkers above ~).
XDoes not prevent you from polymorphing a monster into the genocided
Xtype or chameleons from assuming that form.
X.LI
Xdestroy armor: Destroys outermost layer of armor.  If you are wearing
Xonly armor, it is destroyed.  If you are wearing armor and a helmet,
Xthe helmet is destroyed.  Elven cloak over armor destroys cloak first.
X.LI
Xenchant armor: As destroy armor, but +1 added to enchantment.
XAlso removes stickeycurse.  Don't overdo it; armor tends to
Xevaporate if enchanted beyond +3. 
X.LI
Xenchant weapon: weapon in hand or random if barehanded. Otherwise as 
Xenchant armor, applied to weapons.
X.P
XBoth enchants make item glow green.
XThere are two kinds of these \- one makes your weapon glow green
Xfor a ``moment,'' the other for a ``while.''  The first is +1, the
Xsecond is +2. This also applies to enchant armor, and damage weapon.
XIf barehanded (or naked skin for armor) your skin itches or hands
Xtwitch. Also applies to damage weapon and destroy
Xarmor.  Enchanting a worm tooth turns it into a crysknife, a very 
Xpowerful weapon.  Overenchanted weapons (> +3) also evaporate.
X.LI
Xdamage weapon:  -1 added to weapon. No effect on or of stickeycurse.
XMakes item glow black. (see enchant weapon)
XRead on a crysknife, this turns it back into a wormtooth, and
Xreports that your weapon seems duller.
X.LI
Xfood/gold/object/monster detection: briefly see all on level.
X.LI
Xmagic mapping: all rooms, corridors, secret doors and stairs on level 
Xrevealed. Amnesia is the nemesis.
X.LI
Xamnesia: accumulated map of level lost, except for where you're standing.
XIn NetHack, the message ``Who was that Maud person anyway'' is displayed.
XThis is an inside joke, as previous versions say: ``Thinking of Maud
Xyou forget everything else.''
X.LI
Xteleportation: random spot on level.  See ring of teleport control.
XUseful in shops.
X.LI
Xfire: reduces your maximum hit points permanently.
X.LI
Xtaming: difficult to identify.  If a monster is in sight, it becomes tame,
Xlike your dog, but there is no message. The monster is then equivalent 
Xto a polymorphed dog.  Thereafter, scroll is named in inventory.
XReading it when surrounded by multiple monsters seems to affect only
Xthe ones nearest you, i.e., a maximum of 8 monsters could be affected.
XWarning: If you abandon a tame monster (on a level) it will go wild, 
Xand will not be pacified by tripe.  Tamed ghosts are possible, but because
Xthey do not eat anything, they cannot be rewarded and hence
Xeventually return to their accustomed hostile state.
X.LI
Xidentify: identify one item.  A few (perhaps 1 in 10) of these will ID 
Xall items of a type that you own.  Use it on rings first, potions 
Xsecond.  Note that if you choose to ID a)ll items, then you had better 
Xhave one of the special types, or you will only get the first item in 
Xyour inventory identified.
X.LI
Xremove curse: gets rid of all stickeycurses on worn items.
X``You feel like someone is helping you.''  This scroll is very
Ximportant!  Anyone wielding a -3 dart, wearing a cursed ring of 
Xlevitation, or dragging about a heavy iron ball can attest to
Xthis fact.
X.LI
Xcreate monster: one monster in adjacent square, appropriate to level.
XNote if it creates orcs or killer bees, it will make a whole tribe of 
Xthem.
X.LI
Xmonster confusion: your hands begin to glow blue.  The next monster you
Xhit with a hand-to-hand attack will be confused, and your hands will
Xstop glowing.  A confused monster (assuming it survives the blow that 
Xconfused it) will move in random directions, attacking anything in its 
Xway.  This includes you (so don't confuse your dog!) or other 
Xmonsters.
X.LI
Xpunishment: this cursed scroll outfits you with a ball and chain, 
Xindicated on the screen by @_0.  The ball, if left to drag, may slow 
Xyou down.  However, it can also be picked up, and if then wielded as a 
Xweapon, is devastatingly effective.  It is also very heavy, however,
Xand scrolls of enchant weapon have no effect on it.
XThe remove curse scroll will cause ball and chain to come loose; you 
Xcan drop them then, but I'd suggest sticking with them if you're 
Xstrong enough.  Also good for getting around fast. Try picking up the 
Xball, and throwing it in the direction you want to go.
XIt is possible that this scroll may reduce your luck
Xto 0 for the duration.
X.LI
Xscare monster: Similar to rogue in use. If you pick up a scroll that
X``turned to dust,'' it \fIwas\fR a scare monster scroll that had already
Xbeen dropped.  If you read a scare monster scroll, the message is displayed:
X``You hear maniacal laughter in the distance.'' This is the gods laughing
Xat your stupidity, for you are supposed to drop the scroll on the floor.
XMonsters will not attack you when you stand on one, nor will they cross it
Xif dropped in a corridor. Unlike Elbereth, you can fight from a scare
Xmonster scroll. You can move on and off the scroll if you avoid picking
Xit up; if you pick it up it will turn to dust.
X.LI
Xblank: this scroll "appears to be blank."  This scroll may be utilized
Xwith a magic marker: write the name of a scroll you are already familiar
Xwith (i.e. one that you've read at least once).
X.LE
X.P
X'
X.H 2 "Potions"
X'
X.S 8 10
X.W 7i
X.TS
Xcenter,box;
Xc c c
Xlw(.9i) | lw(2.3i) | lw(3i).
XPotion	Standard Message	Special Case(s)
X_
Xrestore strength	Wow! This makes you feel great!	T{
X... looks sound and hale again! (Thrown to monster)
XT}
Xgain energy	Magical energies course through your body.	T{
XYou feel feverish. (Confused)
XT}
Xwhiskey	Ooph!  This tastes like liquid fire!	T{
XYou feel somewhat dizzy. (Vapor)
XT}
Xinvisibility	Gee!  All of a sudden, your can't see yourself.	T{
XFor an instant you couldn't see you right hand. (Vapor)
X.br
XYou feel rather airy. (Blinded)
XT}
Xfruit juice	This tastes like fruit juice.
Xhealing	You begin to feel better.	T{
X... looks sound and hale again! (Thrown to monster)
XT}
Xparalysis	Your feet are frozen to the floor!	T{
XSomething seems to be holding you. (Vapor)
X.br
XYou are motionlessly suspended. (Levitated)
XT}
Xmonster detection	You sense the presence of monsters.	T{
XYou feel threatened. (No monsters)
XT}
Xobject detection	You sense the presence of objects.	T{
XYou sense the presence of objects close nearby.
X.br
XYou feel a pull downward. (No objects)
XT}
Xsickness	Yech! This stuff tastes like poison.	T{
X... looks rather ill. (Thrown to monster)
XT}
Xconfusion	Huh, What?  Where am I?	T{
XWhat a trippy feeling. (Hallucinating)
X.br
XYou feel somewhat dizzy. (Vapor)
XT}
Xgain strength	Wow do you feel strong!	T{
X... looks sound and hale again! (Thrown to monster)
XT}
Xspeed	You are suddenly moving much faster.	T{
XYour knees seem more flexible now. (Vapor)
X.br
XYour legs get new energy. (Fast)
XT}
Xblindness	A cloud of darkness falls upon you.	T{
XIt suddenly gets dark. (Vapor)
X.br
XBummer! Everything is dark! Help! (Hallucinating)
XT}
Xgain level	You feel more experienced.
Xextra healing	You feel much better.	T{
X... looks sound and hale again! (Thrown to monster)
XT}
Xlevitation	You're floating in the air! (Hallucinating)
Xhallucination	Oh wow! Everything looks so cosmic!	T{
XYou have a vision for a moment. (Vapor)
XT}
Xholy water	You feel full of awe.	T{
XThis burns like acid. (When you are a Z,V,W or &)
X.br
X... shrieks in pain! (Thrown to a Z,V,W,' ' or &)
XT}
X.TE
X.S
X.W
X'
X.H 2 "Rings"
X'
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,box;
Xc c c c
Xl n | l n.
XName#Chance#Name#Chance
X_
Xadornment#?#protection#?
Xaggravate monster#?#protection from shape changers#?
Xcold resistance#?#regeneration#?
Xconflict#?#searching#?
Xfire resistance#?#see invisible#?
Xgain strength#?#stealth#?
Xhunger#?#teleport control#?
Xincrease damage#?#teleportation#?
Xlevitation#?#warning#?
Xpoison resistance#?##
X.TE
X.P
X.VL 10
X.LI
XNOTE:
Xall rings increase your food consumptions to varying degrees.
X.LE
X.P
X.AL
X.LI
Xcold resistance: You are invulnerable to cold, including backblasts from
Xthe wand and freezing spheres.
X.LI
Xfire resistance: You are invulnerable to fire, including backblasts from
Xthe wand and dragon breath.
X.LI
Xteleport control: gives you control of teleport destination, no matter what 
Xdoes the teleporting.  Try to teleport into a wall or monster and you get a
Xrandom teleport.  Gives no control of when you go, just where.
X.LI
Xregeneration: Regain extra one hit point per round (but increases food
Xconsumption dramatically).
X.LI
Xconflict: causes monsters to attack each other instead of you, if they are 
Xnext to each other.
X.LI
Xhunger: Increases hunger.
X.LI
Xstealth: Monsters don't wake up when you enter a room.
X.LI
Xsearching: finds secret doors/traps more easily, and occasionally without 
Xsearching.  Does not necessarily work on first try.
XAlso finds mimics and piercers.
X.LI
Xincrease damage: Increases the damage you do to monsters when hitting them.
X.LI
Xprotection: Increases your armor class and probably your (internal) saving
Xthrows.  Can be +1, +2, etc or cursed -1,-2, etc.	
X.LI
Xteleportation: teleports you randomly about every once in a while.  No way 
Xto control when, but a ring of teleport control determines where.
XWithout this ring, destination
Xis random on level. Is usually stickeycursed and uses a great deal of food
Xenergy.
X.LI
Xadornment: useless in rogue, but in Hack it protects against nymphs
X(they're dazzled by it and can't attack).
X.LI
Xresistance to poison: You are invulnerable to poison (including poison 
Xcorpses but not rotted ones, and all poison stings, bites, and potions).
Xdoes not protect you from rotted (tainted) meat or potions of sickness.
X.LI
Xgain strength: Just what it says.  Increments as with ring of protection.
X.LI
Xprotection from shape changers: Forces chameleons to take on their
Xtrue form (:).
X.LI
Xwarning: glows in various colors, which may be indications of approaching
Xmonsters, traps, etc.  Code unknown.
X.LI
Xlevitation: equivalent to a potion of levitation when worn.  Has minor
Xadvantages if you wish to avoid traps, but a cursed ring of levitation
Xcould spell the end of your character!  You are unaffected by traps,
Xbut you cannot pick anything up or go downstairs.
X.LI
Xsee invisible: same as potion.
X.P
XYou can wear only one of these items on each hand at any time, so
Xa stickeycursed ring is a pain when say, you want protection from fire, but 
Xyou're too heavily loaded to take off your increase strength ring, and your 
Xring of searching is stuck on.
X.LE
X'
X.H 2 "Wands"
X'
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,box;
Xc c c c
Xl n | l n.
XName#Chance#Name#Chance
X_
Xlight#10#cancellation#5
Xsecret door detection#5#teleportation#5
Xcreate monster#5#make invisible#7
Xwishing#1#probing#2
Xstriking#7#digging#5
Xnothing#2#magic missile#10
Xslow monster#5#fire#5
Xspeed monster#5#sleep#5
Xundead turning#5#cold#5
Xpolymorph#5#death#1
X.TE
X.P
XWhen a wand is out of charges and you zap it, ``Nothing Happens.''
X.P
X.AL
X.LI
XWishing: you usually get 3 wishes, and wishing for wands of wishing
Xproduces wands with 0 charges left.  When it asks you what you want,
Xanswer with the exact syntax it would appear in your inventory as, if
Xyou had identified it with the scroll of ID.  The wand does not ID
Xit for you, so be sure and keep track of what you've received and
Xname the items as necessary.
XIf you wish for an illegal item or a non-existent item,
Xyou get a random one.  You can wish for any plussed item up to +3,
Xabove that you take your chances.  You can wish for one wand or 3 of
Xany other non-plussed item with each wish. Sample wishes:
X.BL
X.LI
X+3 plate mail/pair of gloves/helmet/elven cloak/crysknife 
X.LI
X3 potions of gain level
X.LI
Xring of regeneration/teleport control(#)
X.LI
X3 tins (No way to specify spinach, but the odds are good) 
X.LE
X.P
XWishing for ``a wand of wishing (3)'' will not work.
X``Illegal'' wishes that seem to work often are +7 plate, 3 +3 crysknives
X(but sometimes gives 3 -3 crysknives)  Your luck may influence the 
Xchance of getting many items.  In NetHack, it's a good idea to wish for
Xrare spellbooks.
X.LI
XDrain Life: usually kills target creature, taking
Xhalf of everything else's hit points, including yours.  This is a ray.
X.LI
XSleep: of variable duration, and doesn't seem to work on bats.  Some 
Xmonsters get saving throws (i.e., a chance not to be affected). This 
Xis a ray.
X.LI
XFire, Cold, Lightning, Magic Missile: all fire rays/bolts/zaps which do
Xdamage to anything they hit. (See note below.)  Cold seems to do the 
Xmost damage, missiles do the least, fire seems to have the longest range.
X.LI
XStriking: wand hits the first monster in the direction you point it, even 
Xfrom a considerable (but not infinite) distance. Not a ray.
X.LI
XPolymorph: turns one monster or thing into a random other.
XOf course, most people would rather turn a dragon 
Xinto a bat than vice versa.  Use on your dog intil you get a monster 
Xwell above norm for your level, or a mega-monster.  May not change all 
Xcharacteristics of the monster (i.e., speed may be unchanged).
XWarning: if you polymorph your dog, then leave his level (fall in
Xa trapdoor, etc) he will not be tamed merely by throwing food at
Xhim (need taming scroll). The dungeon apparently forgets he ever
Xwas your dog.  While it may be fun to polymorph your dog, you are
Xbetter advised to use it against any mega-monsters that you may
Xfind at the higher level (e.g. Dragons, demons, trappers).  Your
Xdog is a fairly strong monster in his own right. 
XThis wand is almost as useful as digging when you're being digested
Xby a trapper or a purple worm; have you ever been inside a nymph?
X.LI
XMake invisible: makes monster invisible, permanently.
XDon't use on dog, you'll just keep tripping over him. Easy to
Xconfuse with teleport away. No use whatsoever, except to maybe keep you 
Xfrom taking the wand of teleport away for granted.
X.LI
XTeleport monster: monster teleported to random spot on level.
XCheck to be sure you don't have a wand of invisibility. Note 
Xthat the monster will usually head straight back home at top speed,
Xand if he finds you still there, or on the way out, he will be pissed.
X.LI
XHaste monster: monster moves twice as fast. Use on dog, but watch you
Xdon't trip on him.
X.LI
XSlow monster: monster moves at half speed. Some monsters get multiple 
Xattacks every other round (i.e. xorn: 3 claws and bite, or shopkeeper:
X2 fists).
X.LI
XDigging: This produces new corridor sections, and doors where the ray 
Xintersects a room wall.  Also useful for blasting your way out of a trapper.
X.LI
XUndead turning: somewhat like fear, but no effect on most monsters.  
XUndead are: zombies, ghosts, wraiths, vampires, demons and 
Xperhaps other monsters. Destroys weaker undead, causes bigger ones 
Xto flee, including demons.
X.LI
XCreate monster: Creates a monster next to you, just like the scroll.  
XThis wand may be useful to keep around if you are ever desperately short on
Xfood.  If you are, create a monster, kill it, and feast on the remains!
X.LI
XCancellation: Should knock out any magical abilities of the monster. 
XMonsters affected: 
X.TS
Xcenter;
Xc c
Xl l.
XMonster	Effect
X_
XNymphs	cancels her magical allure.
XWraiths	cancels life draining.
XDemons 	cancels powers of replication.
XLeprechauns	cancels teleport ability
X.TE
XMonsters which are not affected:
XRust Monsters, Dragons, Invisible Stalkers, Chameleons, Cockatrices,
XFloating Eyes.
X.LI
XSecret door detection: discovers all secret doors in room or in sight in
Xa corridor.  If there are none, a charge is used and the wand seems
Xto do nothing.  This wand also detects shape-changers in the
Xroom (e.g. mimics, piercers). Usually comes in 10+ charges.
X.LI
XLight: lights up dark rooms. Usually comes in 10+ charges.
X.LI
XProbing: Gives stats on a creature in the direction you indicate. Tells
Xhit points, maximum, how much gold.
X.LE
X.H 3 "Don't shoot your own foot off."
XNote that ray/straight-line wands are best fired when you are 
Xdiagonally aligned with your target so that ricochets can't hit you.
Xricochets can be used to hit targets that won't get in straight line of fire 
X(leprechauns, shopkeepers, etc.), or to get two hits on a
Xtarget.  Shots into corners 
Xbounce straight back at you.  Doors can reflect a diagonal shot back at you, 
Xand the wand of fire reflects diagonally back at you occasionally just for the 
Xheck of it.  Wands seem to have differing, and possibly partly random, maximum
Xranges.
X.H 3 "Test them first."
XWhen you get a wand, try zapping it.  If it is non-directional, (like
Xwishing) you will usually find out what it is immediately.  If not, hit
X<ESC> when it asks you what direction, and save it until you reach a monster.
XThis lets you ID many wands before you find a monster to test 
Xthem out on, and improves the odds that a partly-tested, directional wand
Xwill turn out to be offensive, rather than secret door detection or light.
X.H 1 "EXTENDED COMMAND SET"
XThese commands are accessed by first entering a pound sign (#)
Xfollowed by the command or a question mark.  Not found in all
Xversions of Hack.
X.VL 10
X.LI #dip
XUse for every potion that you want to quaff the #dip command, 
Xdip arrows, bolts or darts in the potion and if it was a potion of :
XSickness or Paralysis: your dipped weapon gets stronger.
XHoly water: your weapon gets blessed and is better in use 
Xagainst the undead.  Note that positive potions have a 
Xpositive effect on monsters.  The dip command can also be used
Xwith fountains.  (see ``Fountains'' and ``Excalibur.'') 
X.LI #pray
XYou can pray after intervals of approximately 500 turns.
XPraying restores strength, fills the stomach and heals.
XYou can use the option time to see how much time has passed.
XNothing bad will happen, but be sure that your time has come.
X.LI #sit
XUse this command while you are on an throne (\).
XYou might get a wish (Chance 1 in 86) but also you can lose 
Xyour gold or your possessions get cursed or identified.
X.LI #wipe
XClean your face when dirty.
X.LI #breathe 
XFirst polymorph yourself in a Dragon.
X.LI #remove
XFirst polymorph into a Nymph
X.LI #cast
XCast spell. See next section.
X'
X.H 2 "Spells and Spellbooks"
X'
XSpells are found in spellbooks and learned via the ``X'' command.
XSave extra spellbooks; if you read a scroll of amnesia you may
Xforget all your spells.  Most spellbooks are booby-trapped with
Xpoison or other effects (``You feel threatened'' accompanied by paralysis)
Xand yield no spell.
X.P
X.TS H
Xtab (#),center,box;
Xc c c c c c
Xl n n | l n n.
XName#Chance#Level#Name#Chance#Level
X_
X.TH
Xmagic missile#4#2#detect unseen#4#3
Xfireball#2#4#extra healing#3#3
Xsleep#6#1#charm monster#3#3
Xcone of cold#1#5#levitation#3#4
Xfinger of death#1#7#restore strength#2#4
Xhealing#6#1#invisibility#3#4
Xdetect monsters#5#1#detect treasure#3#4
Xforce bolt#4#1#dig#2#5
Xlight#5#1#remove curse#2#5
Xconfuse monster#5#2#magic mapping#2#5
Xcure blindness#3#2#identify#1#5
Xslow monster#4#2#turn undead#1#6
Xcreate monster#4#2#polymorph#1#6
Xdetect food#5#2#create familiar#1#6
Xhaste self#3#3#teleport away#2#6
Xcause fear#4#3#cancellation#1#7
Xcure sickness#3#3#genocide#1#7
X.TE
X.P
XThere most powerful spellbooks are, in order of importance: Polymorph,
XGenocide, Identify, Charm Monster, Magic Mapping, Digging and Finger of
XDeath.
X.P
XThe polymorph spell works on objects as well as monsters, although
Xthe object type remains consistent.  You can lay down a pile of objects
Xand cast the spell until you collect those desired.  There is no
Xlimit to the number of objects you can polymorph at one time.
XA high level characters can even polymorph themselves.  To accomplish
Xthis, enter a period (.) when prompted for the direction.  There are
Xcertain disadvantages to self-polymorphing.  If you polymorph into a
Xnon-humanoid creature, you will not be able to use your weapon or
Xarmor.  Although you inherit all the creatures characteristics, this
Xmay also include low hit points. 
X.P
XNote that healing and extra healing do not increase your hitpoints
Xpast the maximum (in NetHack 1.4 or later).
X.H 1 "ITEMS (Tools, Gems, etc.)"
X.H 2 "Tools"
XTools are ``applied'' with the ``a'' command.
X'
X.H 3 "Whistles"
XWhen you blow an ordinary whistle (syntax is ``a whistle'')
Xyou produce a high whistling sound and your dog,
Ximmediately heads in your direction.  Particularly useful if you are
Xteleporting randomly.  Magic whistles (syntax is ``magic 
Xwhistle'') produce a strange whistling sound, and teleport your dog to you. 
XBe careful, whistling may also wake up other denizens of the level.
X.P
X.H 3 "Icebox"
XThis is the Archaeologist/Speleologist's ``large box.''  Corpses
Xpromptly placed in it will not spoil.  It is, however, incredibly heavy and
Xyou must be carrying both the box and the corpse to use it.  You may want to 
Xleave it on the first level and go back for it when you've had some spinach.
X.P
X.H 3 "Camera"
XTourists start out with this one. Flash in the direction of a
Xmonster to temporarily dazzle the monster.
X.P
X.H 3 "Pickaxe"
XArchaeologist's handy tool.  Can be used to dig down or
Xaround.  Will even get in a shop if you're persistent, though the shopkeeper
Xwill ask you to leave it outside.
X.P
X.H 3 "Leash"
XSupposedly quite handy, though code isn't clean yet (dropping the leash
Xstill leaves fido tethered to you).
X.H 3 "Can Opener"
XThe best thing to open tins with.
X'
X.H 2 "Amulet" 
X'
XThe Amulet of Yendor, the lengendary item from the days of Rogue, is
Xfound on level 40, guarded by the Wizard of Yendor and his faithful
XHell Hound. (See the section on lower level ``Strategy'' for a
Xdiscussion of obtaining the Amulet.)
XYou can also wish the Amulet, but you will get a cheap
Ximitation amulet instead.
X'
X.H 2 "Gems"
X'
X.TS
Xtab(#),center, box;
Xc c c
Xl n n.
XName#Chance#Value
X_
Xdilithium crystal#1#4500
Xdiamond#1#4000
Xruby#1#3500
Xsapphire#1#3000
Xemerald#1#2500
Xturquoise#1#2000
Xaquamarine#1#1500
Xtourmaline#1#1000
Xtopaz#1#900
Xopal#1#800
Xgarnet#1#700
Xamethyst#1#650
Xagate#2#600
Xonyx#2#550
Xjasper#2#500
Xjade#2#450
X.TE
X.H 1 "TRICKS AND OTHER NON-INTUITIVE ACTIONS"
X.H 2 "Elbereth"
XIf you E)ngrave Elbereth with your bare hands (-), it acts
Xas a sign of peace.  Most monsters are then unable to attack you as
Xlong as you do not move off the square or fight a monster next to you.
XExceptions are dragons, which breathe fire, angry shopkeepers, and
X(in NetHack only) any creature normally armed with a projectile weapon:
X.TS
Xcenter;
Xc c
Xl l.
XMonster	weapon
X_
Xcentaurs	crossbow bolts
Xorcs	darts
Xkops	cream pies
X.TE
X(In Nethack, you cannot throw
Xthings from an Elbereth, but you can still use wands. There is also a
Xchance of inadvertently smudging the word, thus breaking the spell.)
XOther than movement or hand-to-hand fighting, you 
Xcan do anything on an Elbereth, such as quaffing potions, reading scrolls, etc.
X.P
XNote that if you step off the square, or violate it by fighting, the letters 
Xare disturbed and the inscription is no good anymore.  However, you can write
Xit again on the next turn, even on the same square.  If you teleport off the
Xsquare, you are no longer protected, but if you find it again, it will be 
Xundisturbed and potent.  A NetHack Magic Marker can draw an indelible
XElbereth that you can fight from.
X.H 2 "Orcrist"
XIf your weapon in hand is named Orcrist, it gets a hefty bonus
Xon damage (rumored to be +10) against orcs.
X.H 2 "Excalibur"
XDipping a long sword you have called Excalibur is rumored to eventually
Xyield a +5 long sword (after some initial damage).  There are possible
Xcomplications (see ``Fountains'').
X.H 2 "Hit Points and Nurses"
XIronically, nurses do a great deal of damage in battle.  However, if you
Xunwield your weapon and strip yourself of all armor, a nurse will heal
Xyou.  She will even go so far as to continue past your maximum hit
Xpoints.  It is possible to follow a nurse around and gain scores of
Xhit points.
X.H 2 "Your Score"
XBeyond mere survival, an important aspect of the game is your score.
XYou get points for gold, gems (if you leave the dungeon with 
Xthem), and the Amulet.  (The first amulet is worth 5000, each successive 
X(genuine) amulet doubles your score.) You also seem to get points for the 
Xfollowing things:  levels descended to (so dungeon-diving may help), 
Xand magic items identified or possibly just tried out (or possibly 
Xjust accumulated). And also, experience points, seemingly 4-for-1.
XLeaving the dungeon with a pet (especially an experienced one) is
Xalso worth points.  Mapping out rooms, and possibly discovering
Xsecret doors may add to your score.
X.H 2 "Luck"
XThis is an internal variable that can make life in the dungeon
Xmuch easier or much harder.  Little is known about it, but it probable affects
Xyour chances of finding secret doors, waking up monsters, saving vs. magic,
Xand possibly hitting and being hit by monsters.  Giving gems to a unicorn is
Xincreases your luck by one point, while killing/eating humans, unicorns, dogs
Xkops and nurses decreases your luck by \fIfive\fR points.  Throwing a worthless
Xpiece of glass to a unicorn costs you one point, as does playing during
Xthe unlucky phase of the moon.  Note that when the moon is full, you see
Xthe message ``You are lucky, full moon tonight!'' and your luck is
X\fIincreased\fR by one point.
XIt is also rumored that there is also a small chance to 
Xdecrease it slightly by killing defenseless (blinded) monsters.
XThe absolute range of luck is -10 to +10, and you begin with a value
Xfrom 1 to 4, inclusive (ignoring the phase of the moon).
X.bp
X.ce 1
X\fBAPPENDIX A: HACK REFERENCE SHEET\fR
X.S 8 10
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,expand,box;
Xc s s s s s
Xc c c c c c
Xc l | c l | c l.
XCOMMAND SUMMARY
X_
X\fIx\fR#Command#\fIx\fR#Command#\fIx\fR#Command
X_
Xa#apply, use#j#move down#s#search
Xb#move down-left#k#move up#t#throw in direction
Xc#call item#l#move right#u#move up-right
Xd#drop item#m#skip over#v#program version
Xe#eat food#n#move down-right#w#wield weapon
X<#up stairs#o#display options#x#list spells
X>#down stairs#p#pay off shopkeeper#:#look
Xh#move left#q#quaff potion#z#zap wand
Xi#inventory#r#read scroll#?#this list
X_
XA#take off some armor#J#run down#S#save game
XB#run down-left#K#run up#T#take off armor
XC#name something#L#run right#U#run up-right
XD#drop objects#,#pick up all#V#game history
XE#engrave#N#run down-right#W#wear armor
X^R#redraw screen#O#set options#X#transcribe
X^P#last message#P#put on ring#Y#run up-left
XH#run left#Q#quit game#\e#list discovered items
XI#select inventory#R#take off ring#/#identify
X.TE
X.P
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,expand,box;
Xc c c c c c c c c
Xc l l | c l l | c l l.
XN#Name#Attack#N#Name#Attack#N#Name#Attack
X_
XA#giant ant#saps strength#V#vampire#lowers max. HP#r#rockmole
XB#bat##W#wraith#takes levels#s#scorpion#poison stings
XC#centaur##X#xorn#+hits#s#giant spider
XD#dragon#flames#Y#yeti##t#tengu#teleports
XE#floating eye#transfixes#Z#zombie##u#unicorn#friendly
XF#freezing sphere#cold blasts#a#acid blob#corrodes#v#violet fungi#holds
XG#gnome##b#giant beetle##w#long worm#divides
XH#hobgoblin##c#cockatrice#petrifies#w#wumpus
XI#invisible stalker##d#dog##x#xan#pricks
XJ#jackal##e#ettin#tough#y#yellow light#blinds
XK#keystone kop#throws pies#f#fog cloud##z#zruty
XK#kobold##g#gel. cube#freezes# #ghost#tough
XL#leprechaun#steals gold#h#homunculus#sleep#@#shopkeeper#tough
XM#mimic#chest(])#i#imp##`#lurker above#swallows
XN#nymph#steals items#j#jaguar##,#trapper#swallows
XO#orc#uses darts#k#killer bee#poison stings#:#chameleon#changes
XP#purple worm#swallows#l#leocrotta##;#giant eel
XQ#quasit#FAST#m#minotaur##&#demon#replicates
XQ#quantum mech.#teleports you#n#nurse#heals#1#Wizard#magic
XR#rust monster#rusts armor#o#owlbear#hugs#2#mail daemon#delivers mail
XS#snake#poison bites#p#piercer#drops#9#giant#throws boulders
XT#troll#regenerates#q#quiv. blob#
XU#umber hulk#confuses#r#giant rat#
X.TE
X.P
X.TS
Xtab (%),center,expand,box;
Xc s s s s s
Xc c c c c c
Xl l || l n | l n.
XEXTENDED COMMAND SET/EXPERIENCE LEVELS
X_
XCommand%Effect%Level%Points%Level%Points
X_
X#breathe:%to breathe fire%1 =%initial%8 =%640
X#cast:%to cast spells%2 =%10%9 =%1280
X#dip:%to dip an item%3 =%20%10 =%2560
X#pray:%to pray%4 =%40%11 =%5120
X#remove:%to steal an item%5 =%80%12 =%10240
X#sit:%to sit on a throne%6 =%160%13 =%20480
X#wipe:%to wipe eyes%7 =%320%14 =%40960
X.TE
X.S
X.TC
END_OF_Spoilers.mm
if test 89033 -ne `wc -c <Spoilers.mm`; then
    echo shar: \"Spoilers.mm\" unpacked with wrong size!
fi
# end of overwriting check
fi
if test -f date.h -a "${1}" != "-c" ; then 
  echo shar: Will not over-write existing file \"date.h\"
else
echo shar: Extracting \"date.h\" \(88 characters\)
sed "s/^X//" >date.h <<'END_OF_date.h'
X/*	SCCS Id: @(#)date.h	1.4	87/08/08 */
X
Xchar datestring[] = "Mon Nov 30 01:25:12 1987";
END_OF_date.h
if test 88 -ne `wc -c <date.h`; then
    echo shar: \"date.h\" unpacked with wrong size!
fi
# end of overwriting check
fi
if test -f food.tbl -a "${1}" != "-c" ; then 
  echo shar: Will not over-write existing file \"food.tbl\"
else
echo shar: Extracting \"food.tbl\" \(2496 characters\)
sed "s/^X//" >food.tbl <<'END_OF_food.tbl'
X.TS
Xtab (#),center,expand,box;
Xl c c c c
Xl | n n n | l.
XName#Chance#Weight#Energy#Remarks
X_
Xfood ration #46#4#800
Xtripe ration#16#2#200#50% chance of vomiting.
Xpancake#3#1#200
Xdead lizard#3#1#40#Eat to avoid turning to stone.
Xfortune cookie#7#1#40
Xcarrot#2#1#50
Xslice of pizza#5#1#250
Xcream pie#3#1#100
Xtins:#7#1#0
X- spinach#50#7#600#Adds strength
X- peaches#8#8#40
X- salmon#8#7#60#Slippery hands for 1-15 turns
X- apple juice#8#7#20
X- substance#8#7#500#Tastes awful, adds experience.
X- rotten meat#8#7#-50#Causes vomiting.
X- empty can#8#7#0
Xorange#1#1#80
Xapple#1#1#50
Xpear#1#1#50
Xmelon#1#1#100
Xbanana#1#1#80
Xcandy bar#1#1#100
Xegg#1#1#80
Xclove of garlic#1#1#40#Wield against vampires.
Xlump of royal jelly #0#1#200#Cures xans, strength +
X.TE
X.TS H
Xtab (#),center,expand,box;
Xl c c c 
Xl | n n | l.
XName#Weight#Energy#Remarks
X_
X.TH
Xdead human#40#400#Permanent aggravate monster.
Xdead giant ant#3#30#Poisonous.
Xdead giant bat#3#30#Confusion.
Xdead centaur#50#500
Xdead dragon#150#1500#Fire resistance.
Xdead floating eye#1#10#Telepathy, damage
Xdead freezing sphere#1#10#Cold resistance.
Xdead gnome#10#100
Xdead hobgoblin#20#200
Xdead stalker#40#400#See invisible.
Xdead jackal#10#100
Xdead kobold#10#100#Poisonous.
Xdead leprechaun#40#400#Teleport ability, damage. 
Xdead mimic#40#400#Mimic a treasure chest.
Xdead nymph#40#400#Teleport ability, damage. 
Xdead orc#20#200#Damage.
Xdead purple worm#70#700#Damage.
Xdead quantum mechanic#20#200#Teleport ability, damage.
Xdead rust monster#50#500#Damage.
Xdead snake#10#100#Poisonous.
Xdead troll#40#400
Xdead umber hulk#50#500#Damage.
Xdead vampire#40#400Poisonous.
Xdead wraith#1#10#Gain level.
Xdead xorn#70#700
Xdead yeti#70#700#Cold resistance.
Xdead zombie#3#30
Xdead acid blob#3#30#Poisonous.
Xdead giant beetle#1#10#Poisonous.
Xdead cockatrice#3#30#Instant death.
Xdead dog#20#200#Aggravate monsters.
Xdead ettin#3#30
Xdead fog cloud#1#10
Xdead gelatinous cube#10#100
Xdead homunculus#20#200#Poisonous.
Xdead imp#1#10
Xdead jaguar#30#300#Gain level?
Xdead killer bee#1#10#Poison resistance.
Xdead leocrotta#50#500
Xdead minotaur#70#700# 
Xdead nurse#40#400#Heal, aggravate monsters.
Xdead owlbear#70#700
Xdead piercer#20#200
Xdead quivering blob#10#100
Xdead giant rat#3#30
Xdead giant scorpion#10#100#Poisonous.
Xdead tengu#30#300#Teleport ability.
Xdead unicorn#30#300#Damage.
Xdead violet fungus#10#100#Hallucinogenic.
Xdead long worm#50#500
Xdead xan#30#300#Damage.
Xdead yellow light#1#10#Confusion, vision++
Xdead zruty#60#600#Damage.
Xdead giant#70#700#Strength++.
Xdead daemon#80#800
X.TE
END_OF_food.tbl
if test 2496 -ne `wc -c <food.tbl`; then
    echo shar: \"food.tbl\" unpacked with wrong size!
fi
# end of overwriting check
fi
echo shar: End of archive 1 \(of 13\).
cp /dev/null ark1isdone
MISSING=""
for I in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 ; do
    if test ! -f ark${I}isdone ; then
	MISSING="${MISSING} ${I}"
    fi
done
if test "${MISSING}" = "" ; then
    echo You have unpacked all 13 archives.
    rm -f ark[1-9]isdone ark[1-9][0-9]isdone
else
    echo You still need to unpack the following archives:
    echo "        " ${MISSING}
fi
##  End of shell archive.
exit 0
